Texas statutes.
TRANSPORTATION CODE

TITLE 7. VEHICLES AND TRAFFIC

SUBTITLE A. CERTIFICATES OF TITLE AND REGISTRATION OF VEHICLES

CHAPTER 504. LICENSE PLATES

SUBCHAPTER A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 504.001. DEFINITIONS. (a) In this chapter:

(1) "Board" means the board of the Texas Department of Motor Vehicles.

(2) "Department" means the Texas Department of Motor Vehicles.

(3) "Purchaser" and "seller" have the meanings assigned by Section 501.002.

(b) A word or phrase that is not defined by this chapter but is defined by Section 502.001 has the meaning in this chapter that is assigned by that section.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1320, Sec. 6, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 933 (H.B. 3097), Sec. 2G.01, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1296 (H.B. 2357), Sec. 166, eff. January 1, 2012.

Sec. 504.0011. RULES. The board may adopt rules to implement and administer this chapter.

Redesignated and amended from Transportation Code, Section 504.004 by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1296 (H.B. 2357), Sec. 167, eff. January 1, 2012.

Sec. 504.002. GENERAL PROVISIONS. (a) Unless expressly provided by this chapter or by department rule:

(1) except for license plates specified as exempt, the fee for issuance of a license plate, including replacement plates, is in addition to each other fee that is paid for at the time of the registration of the motor vehicle and shall be deposited to the credit of the Texas Department of Motor Vehicles fund;

(2) if the registration period is greater than 12 months, the expiration date of a specialty license plate, symbol, tab, or other device shall be aligned with the registration period, and the specialty plate fee shall be adjusted pro rata, except that if the statutory annual fee for a specialty license plate is $5 or less, it may not be prorated;

(3) the department is the exclusive owner of the design of each license plate;

(4) if a license plate is lost, stolen, or mutilated, an application for a replacement plate must be accompanied by the fee prescribed by Section 502.060; and

(5) the department shall prepare the designs and specifications of license plates.

(b) If necessary to cover the costs of issuing license plates for golf carts under Section 551.402 or off-highway vehicles under Section 551A.052, the department may charge an administrative fee, in an amount established by the department by rule, for the issuance of a golf cart or off-highway vehicle license plate.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1320, Sec. 6, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1296 (H.B. 2357), Sec. 168, eff. January 1, 2012.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1287 (H.B. 2202), Sec. 35, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1233 (H.B. 1548), Sec. 10, eff. June 14, 2019.

Sec. 504.005. DESIGN AND ALPHANUMERIC PATTERN. (a) The department has sole control over the design, typeface, color, and alphanumeric pattern for all license plates.

(b) The department shall prepare the designs and specifications of license plates and devices selected by the board to be used as a unique identifier.

(c) The department shall design each license plate to include a design at least one-half inch wide that represents in silhouette the shape of Texas and that appears between letters and numerals. The department may omit the silhouette of Texas from specially designed license plates.

(d) To promote highway safety, each license plate shall be made with a reflectorized material that provides effective and dependable brightness for the period for which the plate is issued.

Transferred, redesignated and amended from Transportation Code, Section 504.103 by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1296 (H.B. 2357), Sec. 169, eff. January 1, 2012.

Sec. 504.0051. PERSONALIZED LICENSE PLATES. (a) The department shall issue personalized license plates, including those issued in accordance with the marketing vendor as provided in Subchapter J. The department may not issue more than one set of license plates with the same alphanumeric pattern.

(b) The department may not issue a replacement set of personalized plates to the same person before the period set by rule unless the applicant for issuance of replacement plates pays the fee required by Section 504.007.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1296 (H.B. 2357), Sec. 170, eff. January 1, 2012.

Sec. 504.006. COST OF MANUFACTURING. (a) The department shall reimburse the Texas Department of Criminal Justice for the cost of manufacturing license plates as the invoices for the license plates are delivered to the department.

(b) When manufacturing is started, the Texas Department of Criminal Justice and the department, after negotiation, shall set the price to be paid for each license plate. The price must be determined from:

(1) the cost of metal, paint, and other materials purchased;

(2) the inmate maintenance cost per shift;

(3) overhead expenses;

(4) miscellaneous charges; and

(5) a previously agreed upon amount of profit for the work.

Transferred, redesignated and amended from Transportation Code, Section 502.053 by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1296 (H.B. 2357), Sec. 171, eff. January 1, 2012.

Sec. 504.007. REPLACEMENT LICENSE PLATES. (a) The owner of a registered motor vehicle may obtain replacement license plates for the vehicle by:

(1) certifying that the replacement plates will not be used on any other vehicle owned or operated by the person making the statement;

(2) paying a fee of $6 plus the fee required by Section 502.356(a) for each set of replacement license plates, unless otherwise specified by law; and

(3) returning to the department each license plate in the owner's possession for which a replacement license plate is obtained.

(b) Replacement license plates may not be issued except as provided by this section.

(c) A county assessor-collector shall retain $2.50 of each fee collected under this section and forward the remainder of the fee to the department for deposit to the credit of the Texas Department of Motor Vehicles fund.

(d) The fee required by this section applies to the issuance of license plates for a transferred used vehicle for which the registration and license plates were not transferred under Section 504.901.

(e) Replacement license plates may be used in the registration year in which the plates are issued and during each succeeding year of the registration period as set by rule if the registration insignia is properly displayed on the vehicle.

(f) Subsection (e) does not apply to the issuance of specialized license plates for limited distribution, including exempt plates for governmental entities and temporary registration plates.

Text of subsection as added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 490 (H.B. 2663), Sec. 2

(g) No fee is required under this section if a county assessor-collector determines that the owner of a registered motor vehicle did not receive license plates that were issued to the owner by mail.

Text of subsection as added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 968 (S.B. 2075), Sec. 12

(g) No fee is required under this section if the county assessor-collector determines that the owner paid for license plates for the same vehicle that were mailed to the owner but not received by the owner.

Transferred, redesignated and amended from Transportation Code, Section 502.1841 by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1296 (H.B. 2357), Sec. 172, eff. January 1, 2012.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1287 (H.B. 2202), Sec. 36, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 490 (H.B. 2663), Sec. 2, eff. June 9, 2017.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 968 (S.B. 2075), Sec. 12, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 504.008. SPECIALTY LICENSE PLATES. (a) The department shall prepare the designs and specifications of specialty license plates.

(b) Any motor vehicle other than a vehicle manufactured for off-highway use only is eligible to be issued specialty license plates, provided that the department may vary the design of a license plate to accommodate or reflect its use on a motor vehicle other than a passenger car or light truck.

(c) An application for specialty license plates must be submitted in the manner specified by the department, provided that if issuance of a specialty license plate is limited to particular persons or motor vehicles, the application must be accompanied by evidence satisfactory to the department that the applicant or the applicant's vehicle is eligible.

(d) Each fee described by this chapter is an annual fee, provided that the department may prorate the fee for a specialty license plate fee on a monthly basis to align the license plate fee to the registration month for the motor vehicle for which the license plate was issued, and if a fee is prorated the allocation of the fee by this chapter to an account or fund shall be prorated in proportion.

(e) The director or the director's designee may refuse to issue a specialty license plate with a design or alphanumeric pattern that the director or designee considers potentially objectionable to one or more members of the public and the director or designee's refusal may not be overturned in the absence of an abuse of discretion.

(f) For each specialty license plate that is issued by a county assessor-collector and for which the department is allocated a portion of the fee for administrative costs, the department shall credit 50 cents from its administrative costs to the county treasurer of the applicable county, who shall credit the money to the general fund of the county to defray the costs to the county of administering this chapter.

(g) If the owner of a motor vehicle for which a specialty license plate is issued disposes of the vehicle or for any reason ceases to be eligible for that specialty license plate, the owner shall return the specialty license plate to the department.

(h) A person who is issued a specialty license plate may not transfer the plate to another person or vehicle unless the department approves the transfer.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1296 (H.B. 2357), Sec. 173, eff. January 1, 2012.

Sec. 504.009. SOUVENIR LICENSE PLATES. (a) The department may issue a souvenir version of any specialty license plate for any vehicle.

(a-1) On request, the Texas Military Department, as defined by Section 437.001, Government Code, shall issue a souvenir version of the specialty license plate described by Section 504.322.

(b) The fee for a single souvenir license plate is $20. The fee shall be deposited to the credit of the Texas Department of Motor Vehicles fund unless the souvenir license plate is a replica of a specialty license plate issued under Subchapter G or I for which the fee is deposited to an account other than the Texas Department of Motor Vehicles fund, in which case:

(1) $10 of the fee for the souvenir license plate shall be deposited to the credit of the designated account; and

(2) $10 of the fee for the souvenir license plate shall be deposited to the credit of the Texas Department of Motor Vehicles fund.

(c) If a souvenir license plate issued before November 19, 2009, is personalized, the fee for the plate is $40. Of the fee:

(1) $20 shall be deposited to the credit of the Texas Department of Motor Vehicles fund;

(2) $10 shall be deposited to the credit of the designated account if the souvenir license plate is a replica of a specialty license plate issued under Subchapter G or I for which the fee is deposited to a designated account other than the Texas Department of Motor Vehicles fund; and

(3) the remainder shall be deposited to the credit of the general revenue fund.

(c-1) The fee for a souvenir license plate issued on or after November 19, 2009, is the amount established under Section 504.851(c).

(d) A souvenir license plate may not be used on a motor vehicle and is not an insignia of registration for a motor vehicle. Each souvenir license plate must be identified by the department in a way that identifies it to law enforcement officers and others as a souvenir license plate.

(e) A beneficiary of a specialty license plate issued under Subchapter G or I, as designated by the applicable section of those subchapters, may purchase the specialty license plates, in minimum amounts determined by the department, for use or resale by the beneficiary. The beneficiary shall pay the required fee per plate, less the amount of the fee that would be deposited to the credit of the designated account.

Redesignated and amended from Transportation Code, Section 504.003 by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1296 (H.B. 2357), Sec. 174, eff. January 1, 2012.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1287 (H.B. 2202), Sec. 37, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1012 (H.B. 923), Sec. 1, eff. January 1, 2016.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 324 (S.B. 1488), Sec. 24.002(13), eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 504.010. ISSUANCE AND PLACEMENT OF LICENSE PLATE. (a) On payment of the prescribed fee, an applicant for motor vehicle registration shall be issued a license plate or set of plates.

(b) Subject to Section 504.901, the department shall issue only one license plate or set of plates for a vehicle during the registration period set by rule.

(c) The board may adopt rules regarding the placement of license plates for a motor vehicle, road tractor, motorcycle, trailer, or semitrailer.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1296 (H.B. 2357), Sec. 175, eff. January 1, 2012.

SUBCHAPTER B. PERSONALIZED LICENSE PLATES

Sec. 504.101. PERSONALIZED LICENSE PLATES. The department shall issue personalized license plates, including those sold by the private vendor under a contract with the department as provided by Section 504.851.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1296 (H.B. 2357), Sec. 176, eff. January 1, 2012.

Sec. 504.102. PERSONALIZATION OF SPECIALTY LICENSE PLATE. Unless expressly prohibited by this chapter or department rule, any specialty license plate issued under this chapter may be personalized. If a specialty license plate is personalized, the fee for personalization of the specialty license plate shall be added to the fee for issuance of that specialty license plate.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1320, Sec. 6, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1381 (S.B. 1616), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2009.

SUBCHAPTER B-1. DIGITAL LICENSE PLATES

Sec. 504.151. DEFINITIONS. In this subchapter:

(1) "Digital license plate" means an electronic display that is designed to:

(A) display the information required to be included on a physical license plate; and

(B) be placed on the rear of a vehicle in lieu of a physical license plate issued under this chapter.

(2) "Digital license plate provider" means a person engaged in the business of providing digital license plate hardware and services to vehicle owners, including the sale or lease of and issuance of digital license plates.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 594 (S.B. 604), Sec. 3.01, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 504.152. APPLICABILITY OF OTHER LAW. Except as otherwise provided by this subchapter or a rule adopted under this subchapter, a digital license plate issued under this subchapter is subject to the laws of this state applicable to a physical license plate.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 594 (S.B. 604), Sec. 3.01, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 504.153. RULES. The board shall adopt rules as necessary to implement and administer this subchapter.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 594 (S.B. 604), Sec. 3.01, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 504.154. DIGITAL LICENSE PLATES AUTHORIZED. (a) The board by rule shall allow a vehicle described by Subsection (b) to be equipped with a digital license plate that is placed on the rear of the vehicle in lieu of a physical license plate issued under this chapter. The rule must require the owner of a vehicle issued a digital license plate to obtain a physical license plate to be placed on the front of the vehicle unless the vehicle is of a class of vehicles that is not required to display two license plates, as provided by other law.

(b) A vehicle registered under Chapter 502 may be equipped with a digital license plate only if the vehicle:

(1) is part of a commercial fleet, as defined by Section 502.001;

(2) is owned or operated by a governmental entity; or

(3) is not a passenger vehicle.

(c) The department may contract with digital license plate providers for the issuance of digital license plates, including any services related to the issuance of digital license plates.

(d) Notwithstanding any other law, a rule adopted under this subchapter may:

(1) authorize the display of the vehicle's registration insignia on a digital license plate issued for the vehicle in lieu of attaching the registration insignia to the inside of the vehicle's windshield as required by Section 502.059;

(2) establish a fee in an amount necessary to cover any administrative costs incurred that relate to the issuance of a digital license plate and exceed the administrative costs incurred for the issuance of a physical license plate; or

(3) prohibit a digital license plate provider from contracting with the department under Subchapter J.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 594 (S.B. 604), Sec. 3.01, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 504.155. DIGITAL LICENSE PLATES REQUIREMENTS AND PERMISSIVE FUNCTIONALITY. (a) The board by rule shall set the specifications and requirements for digital license plates, including requirements for the placement of digital license plates. The design of and information displayed on a digital license plate must be approved by the department.

(b) A digital license plate issued under this subchapter must:

(1) meet the specifications and requirements adopted under Subsection (a);

(2) include the information required to be included on a physical license plate and legibly display that information at all times and in all light conditions, provided that the license plate may display the information in a smaller typeface when the vehicle is parked;

(3) have wireless connectivity capability; and

(4) provide benefits to law enforcement that meet or exceed the benefits provided by physical license plates as of the time of enactment of this subchapter and as determined by the Department of Public Safety.

(c) In adopting rules under Subsection (a), the board shall consult with the Department of Public Safety. Except as otherwise provided by this subsection and Section 2001.036, Government Code, a rule adopted under Subsection (a) takes effect on the 31st day after the date on which the rule is filed in the office of the secretary of state. A rule adopted under Subsection (a) does not take effect if, not later than the 30th day after the date on which the rule is filed in the office of the secretary of state, the public safety director of the Department of Public Safety submits to the office of the secretary of state written notification invalidating the rule.

(d) A rule adopted under this subchapter may:

(1) authorize the use of a digital license plate for electronic toll collection or to display a parking permit; or

(2) establish procedures for displaying on a digital license plate:

(A) an emergency alert or other public safety alert issued by a governmental entity, including an alert authorized under Subchapter L, M, or P, Chapter 411, Government Code;

(B) vehicle manufacturer safety recall notices;

(C) static logo displays, including unique displays for fleet vehicles; or

(D) advertising approved by the department.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 594 (S.B. 604), Sec. 3.01, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 504.156. DIGITAL LICENSE PLATE PROVIDER POWERS AND DUTIES. A digital license plate provider with whom the department contracts under Section 504.154:

(1) shall maintain an inventory of the digital license plates issued by the provider in this state;

(2) shall make available a digital version of each specialty license plate authorized by this chapter, other than personalized license plates authorized for marketing and sale under Subchapter J, provided that:

(A) each issuance of a specialty license plate with restricted distribution, including a license plate authorized under Subchapter C, D, E, or F, must be approved by the department; and

(B) the provider shall remit to the department in the manner prescribed by the department all money:

(i) payable to the department; or

(ii) required to be used or deposited in the manner prescribed by the law establishing the license plate;

(3) may contract with the private vendor under Subchapter J to make available a digital version of a personalized license plate authorized for marketing and sale under that subchapter, provided that the contract shall conform with any applicable requirements of Subchapter J and the terms of the private vendor's contract with the department;

(4) shall, if a digital license plate displays a registration insignia as authorized by a rule adopted under Section 504.154(d)(1), promptly update the display of the registration insignia to reflect the current registration period for the vehicle and, on request of the department, suspend the display of the registration insignia or indicate on the license plate that the registration insignia for the vehicle is expired;

(5) may provide any service related to the issuance of a digital license plate that is authorized by board rule, including the sale, lease, and installation of and customer service for a digital license plate; and

(6) may charge a fee, payable in installments, for the issuance of a digital license plate or any additional services provided by the provider for that license plate.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 594 (S.B. 604), Sec. 3.01, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 504.157. DEFENSE TO PROSECUTION OF CERTAIN OFFENSES. It is a defense to prosecution of an offense involving the operation of a motor vehicle and relating to the placement of a license plate or the display of a registration insignia that the vehicle was operated in compliance with rules issued under this subchapter governing the placement of a digital license plate or the display of a registration insignia on a digital license plate, as applicable.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 594 (S.B. 604), Sec. 3.01, eff. September 1, 2019.

SUBCHAPTER C. LICENSE PLATES FOR VEHICLES USED BY PERSONS WITH DISABILITIES

Sec. 504.201. PERSONS WITH DISABILITIES. (a) In this section:

(1) "Disability" and "mobility problem that substantially impairs a person's ability to ambulate" have the meanings assigned by Section 681.001.

(2) "Legally blind" means a condition described by Section 681.001(2)(B) or (C).

(3) "Practice of optometry" and "practice of therapeutic optometry" have the meanings assigned by Section 351.002, Occupations Code.

(b) The department shall issue specialty license plates for a motor vehicle that:

(1) has a gross vehicle weight of 18,000 pounds or less; and

(2) is regularly operated for noncommercial use by or for the transportation of a person with a permanent disability.

(c) An owner of a motor vehicle regularly operated by or for the transportation of a person described by Subsection (a) may apply to the department for registration under this section.

(d) Except as provided by Subsection (d-1), the initial application for specialty license plates under this section must be accompanied by a written statement from a physician who is licensed to practice medicine in this state or in a state adjacent to this state or who is authorized by applicable law to practice medicine in a hospital or other health facility of the Department of Veterans Affairs. If the applicant has a mobility problem caused by a disorder of the foot, the written statement may be issued by a person licensed to practice podiatry in this state or a state adjacent to this state. In this subsection, "podiatry" has the meaning assigned by Section 681.001. The statement must certify that the person making the application or on whose behalf the application is made is legally blind or has a mobility problem that substantially impairs the person's ability to ambulate. The statement must also certify whether a mobility problem is temporary or permanent. A written statement is not required as acceptable medical proof if:

(1) the person with a disability:

(A) has had a limb, hand, or foot amputated; or

(B) must use a wheelchair; and

(2) the applicant executes a statement attesting to the person's disability before the county assessor-collector.

(d-1) If the initial application for specialty license plates under this section is made by or on behalf of a person who is legally blind, the written statement required by Subsection (d) may be issued by a person licensed to engage in the practice of optometry or the practice of therapeutic optometry in this state or a state adjacent to this state.

(e) A person with a disability may receive:

(1) one disabled parking placard under Section 681.002 if the person receives a set of license plates under this section; or

(2) two disabled parking placards under Section 681.002 if the person does not receive a set of license plates under this section.

(f) A license plate issued under this section must include the symbol of access adopted by Rehabilitation International in 1969 at its Eleventh World Congress on Rehabilitation of the Disabled. The symbol must be the same size as the numbers on the license plate.

(g) In addition to a license plate issued under this section, an eligible person is entitled to be issued a set of the license plates for each motor vehicle owned by the person that has a gross vehicle weight of 18,000 pounds or less and is equipped with special equipment that:

(1) is designed to allow a person who has lost the use of one or both of the person's legs to operate the vehicle; and

(2) is not standard equipment on that type of vehicle for use by a person who has use of both legs.

(h) Repealed by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1296, Sec. 247(9), eff. January 1, 2012.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1320, Sec. 6, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 153 (S.B. 959), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 531 (S.B. 1367), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 531 (S.B. 1367), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1296 (H.B. 2357), Sec. 177, eff. January 1, 2012.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1296 (H.B. 2357), Sec. 247(9), eff. January 1, 2012.

Sec. 504.202. VETERANS WITH DISABILITIES. (a) A person entitled to specialty license plates under this section may register, for the person's own use, one vehicle without payment of any fee paid for or at the time of registration except the fee for the license plates. Registration under this section is valid for one year.

(b) A veteran of the United States armed forces is entitled to register, for the person's own use, motor vehicles under this section if:

(1) the person has suffered, as a result of military service:

(A) at least a 50 percent service-connected disability; or

(B) a 40 percent service-connected disability because of the amputation of a lower extremity;

(2) the person receives compensation from the United States because of the disability; and

(3) the motor vehicle:

(A) is owned by the person; and

(B) has a gross vehicle weight of 18,000 pounds or less or is a motor home.

(b-1) A person described by Subsection (b) who is eligible to receive license plates under Section 504.201 may elect to receive license plates under this section that include the symbol described by Section 504.201(f). The initial application for license plates under this subsection must be accompanied by:

(1) the written statement required by Section 504.201(d), unless the applicant is an organization described by Subsection (b-2); and

(2) any other information required for an application under this section.

(b-2) An organization that registers a motor vehicle under Subsection (c) may elect to receive license plates under Subsection (b-1) if the vehicle regularly transports veterans who are eligible to receive license plates under Subsection (b-1). The department shall adopt rules prescribing satisfactory proof of eligibility under this subsection.

(c) An organization may register a motor vehicle under this section if:

(1) the vehicle is used exclusively to transport veterans of the United States armed forces who have suffered, as a result of military service, a service-connected disability; and

(2) the veterans are not charged for the transportation.

(d) A statement by the veterans county service officer of the county in which a vehicle described by Subsection (c) is registered or by the Department of Veterans Affairs that a vehicle is used exclusively to transport veterans with disabilities without charge is satisfactory proof of eligibility for an organization.

(e) Other than license plates issued under Subsection (h), license plates issued under this section must include:

(1) the letters "DV" on the plate if the plate is issued for a vehicle other than a motorcycle; and

(2) the words "Disabled Veteran" and "U.S. Armed Forces" at the bottom of each license plate.

Text of subsection as amended by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1050 (S.B. 280), Sec. 2

(e-1) Other than license plates issued under Subsection (h), license plates issued under this section may include, on request:

(1) the emblem of the veteran's branch of service; or

(2) one emblem from another license plate to which the person is entitled under Section 504.308, 504.309, 504.310(b), 504.311, 504.312, 504.313, 504.3135, 504.314, 504.315, 504.316, 504.3161, 504.318, 504.319, 504.320, 504.323, 504.325, 504.327, or 504.331.

Text of subsection as amended by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 385 (H.B. 282), Sec. 1

(e-1) Other than license plates issued under Subsection (h), license plates issued under this section may include, on request:

(1) the emblem of the veteran's branch of service; or

(2) one emblem from another license plate to which the person is entitled under Section 504.308, 504.309, 504.310(b), 504.311, 504.312, 504.313, 504.3135, 504.314, 504.315, 504.316, 504.3161, 504.318, 504.319, 504.320, 504.323, 504.325, 504.327, 504.328, 504.330, 504.331, 504.332, 504.333, 504.334, or 504.335.

Text of subsection as amended by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 506 (H.B. 2503), Sec. 1

(e-1) Other than license plates issued under Subsection (h), license plates issued under this section may include, on request:

(1) the emblem of the veteran's branch of service; or

(2) one emblem from another license plate to which the person is entitled under Section 504.307, 504.308, 504.309, 504.310(b), 504.311, 504.312, 504.313, 504.3135, 504.314, 504.315, 504.316, 504.3161, 504.318, 504.319, 504.320, 504.323, 504.325, 504.327, 504.328, 504.330, 504.331, or 504.332.

(f) The fee for the first set of license plates is $3. There is no fee for each additional set of license plates.

(g) A person who receives license plates under Subsection (b-1) may receive a disabled parking placard under Section 681.004 for each set of license plates.

(h) A person entitled to license plates under this section may elect to receive license plates issued under Chapter 502 under the same conditions for the issuance of license plates under this section.

(i) A license plate with the letters "DV" may be personalized with up to four characters.

(j) A person entitled to license plates under this section may instead use, for a vehicle that meets the requirements of Section 504.501 or 504.502, disabled veteran license plates issued by this state that:

(1) are embossed with an alphanumeric pattern;

(2) are of a plate design that was issued in the same year as the model year of the vehicle;

(3) are approved for use by the department; and

(4) include the symbol described by Section 504.201(f), if the person satisfies the requirements for the issuance of license plates under Subsection (b-1) and elects to include the symbol on the plates.

(k) A reference in law to license plates issued under Subsection (b-1) includes disabled veteran license plates described by Subsection (j)(4).

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1320, Sec. 6, eff. Sept. 1, 2003. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., 3rd C.S., ch. 8, Sec. 5.09, eff. Jan. 11, 2004.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 98 (H.B. 2105), Sec. 1, eff. May 15, 2007.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 617 (H.B. 965), Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 2009.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 965 (H.B. 3593), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 460 (S.B. 1755), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1296 (H.B. 2357), Sec. 178, eff. January 1, 2012.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 7 (S.B. 530), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 223 (H.B. 120), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1135 (H.B. 2741), Sec. 77, eff. June 14, 2013.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 708 (H.B. 1128), Sec. 1, eff. January 1, 2016.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 716 (H.B. 1273), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 324 (S.B. 1488), Sec. 18.001, eff. September 1, 2017.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 968 (S.B. 2075), Sec. 13, eff. September 1, 2017.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1084 (H.B. 3521), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2017.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1085 (H.B. 3567), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2017.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 67 (S.B. 225), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2019.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 186 (H.B. 2039), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2019.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 876 (H.B. 3068), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2019.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 18 (H.B. 1081), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2021.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 92 (S.B. 792), Sec. 2, eff. January 1, 2022.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 130 (H.B. 3401), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2021.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 326 (H.B. 1936), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2021.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 915 (H.B. 3607), Sec. 20.004, eff. September 1, 2021.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 385 (H.B. 282), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2023.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 506 (H.B. 2503), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2023.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 768 (H.B. 4595), Sec. 24.002(21), eff. September 1, 2023.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1050 (S.B. 280), Sec. 2, eff. June 18, 2023.

Sec. 504.203. ISSUANCE OF DISABLED LICENSE PLATES TO CERTAIN INSTITUTIONS. (a) The department shall issue specialty license plates under this subchapter for a van or bus operated by an institution, facility, or residential retirement community for the elderly or for veterans in which an eligible person resides, including:

(1) an institution that holds a license issued under Chapter 242, Health and Safety Code; or

(2) a facility that holds a license issued under Chapter 246 or 247 of that code.

(b) An application for license plates under this section must be accompanied by a written statement acknowledged by the administrator or manager of the institution, facility, or retirement community certifying that the institution, facility, or retirement community regularly transports, as a part of the services that the institution, facility, or retirement community provides, one or more eligible persons who reside in the institution, facility, or retirement community. The department shall determine the eligibility of the institution, facility, or retirement community on the evidence the applicant provides.

(c) The application and eligibility requirements for a license plate under this section are the same as those provided by Sections 504.201 and 504.202, as applicable.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1320, Sec. 6, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1296 (H.B. 2357), Sec. 179, eff. January 1, 2012.

Sec. 504.204. PERSONS WHO ARE DEAF OR HARD OF HEARING. (a) In this section, "deaf" and "hard of hearing" have the meanings assigned by Section 81.001, Human Resources Code.

(b) The department shall design and issue specialty license plates for a motor vehicle that is regularly operated by a person who is deaf or hard of hearing. A license plate issued under this section must include an emblem indicating that the person operating the vehicle is deaf or hard of hearing.

(c) The initial application for specialty license plates under this section must be accompanied by a written statement from a physician who is licensed to practice medicine in this state or in a state adjacent to this state or who is authorized by applicable law to practice medicine in a hospital or other health facility of the Department of Veterans Affairs. The statement must certify that the person making the application is deaf or hard of hearing.

(d) The fee for a set of license plates issued under this section is $8.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 642 (S.B. 1987), Sec. 1, eff. January 1, 2016.

Sec. 504.205. INFORMATION PROVIDED WITH PLATES. The department shall include with each set of specialty license plates issued under this subchapter a document that provides:

(1) information on laws governing parking for persons with disabilities; and

(2) instructions for reporting alleged violations of Chapter 681.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1159 (H.B. 3163), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2019.

SUBCHAPTER D. SPECIALTY LICENSE PLATES FOR THE MILITARY

Sec. 504.301. PROVISIONS GENERALLY APPLICABLE TO MILITARY SPECIALTY LICENSE PLATES. (a) Unless expressly provided by this subchapter or department rule:

(1) the department shall design specialty license plates for the military; and

(2) a person is not eligible to be issued a specialty license plate under this subchapter if the person was discharged from the armed forces under conditions less than honorable.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of this subchapter, the department may design the wording on a specialty license plate authorized by this subchapter to enhance the legibility and reflectivity of the license plate.

(c) Section 504.702 does not apply to a specialty license plate issued under this subchapter.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1320, Sec. 6, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1296 (H.B. 2357), Sec. 180, eff. January 1, 2012.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 223 (H.B. 120), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 504.3011. DESIGN OF CERTAIN LICENSE PLATES FOR THE MILITARY. The department shall design military license plates that:

(1) bear a color depiction of the emblem of the appropriate branch of the United States armed forces or a color depiction of the appropriate medal as provided by the United States Department of Defense; and

(2) include the words "Honorably Discharged" for license plates issued to former members of the United States armed forces.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 258 (S.B. 11), Sec. 11.01, eff. September 1, 2007.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1296 (H.B. 2357), Sec. 181, eff. January 1, 2012.

Sec. 504.3015. FEES FOR MILITARY SPECIALTY LICENSE PLATES. (a) A person applying for a set of license plates under this subchapter shall pay the registration fee required under Chapter 502 and the applicable special plate fee required under this section, except that one set of license plates shall be issued without the payment of the registration fee under:

(1) Section 504.308;

(2) Section 504.310(b);

(3) Section 504.315, other than Subsections (c) and (q) of that section; and

(4) Section 504.319.

(b) The fee for the issuance of one set of specialty license plates issued under Section 504.315(d) or (g) is $3. There is no additional fee for a specialty license plate issued under another provision of this subchapter.

(c) A surviving spouse applying for a set of license plates under Section 504.302 shall pay the fees required for the type of license plate for which the surviving spouse is eligible.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1166 (H.B. 191), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2007.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 223 (H.B. 120), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 432 (S.B. 563), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 716 (H.B. 1273), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 914 (S.B. 1371), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2017.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 67 (S.B. 225), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 504.302. SURVIVING SPOUSES OF CERTAIN MILITARY VETERANS. (a) The surviving spouse of a person who would be eligible for a specialty license plate under this subchapter is entitled to continue to register one vehicle under the applicable section as long as the spouse remains unmarried.

(a-1) The surviving spouse of a person who would be eligible for a specialty license plate under Section 504.308, 504.310, 504.315, 504.316, or 504.319 is entitled to register one vehicle under the applicable section as long as the spouse remains unmarried.

(b) An applicant under this section must submit proof of the eligibility of the applicant's deceased spouse for the applicable specialty license plate.

(c) A surviving spouse applying for specialty license plates under this section must submit a written statement that the spouse is unmarried. If the surviving spouse is applying for Former Prisoner of War, Pearl Harbor Survivor, or Purple Heart specialty license plates, the statement must be sworn to by the surviving spouse.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1320, Sec. 6, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1142 (H.B. 377), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 504.303. MEMBERS OR FORMER MEMBERS OF UNITED STATES ARMED FORCES. (a) The department shall issue specialty license plates for active or former members of the United States armed forces. The license plates must designate the appropriate branch of the United States armed forces.

(b) The department shall include the word "Retired" for license plates issued to retired members of the United States armed forces.

(c) Satisfactory proof of eligibility for a license plate issued under this section to a retired member of the United States armed forces may be demonstrated by:

(1) a letter from any branch of the military under the jurisdiction of the United States Department of Defense or the United States Department of Homeland Security stating that a retired member has 20 or more years of satisfactory federal service; or

(2) an identification card issued by any branch of the military under the jurisdiction of the United States Department of Defense or the United States Department of Homeland Security indicating that the member is retired.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1320, Sec. 6, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1166 (H.B. 191), Sec. 13, eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1206 (S.B. 1376), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 218 (H.B. 789), Sec. 1, eff. January 1, 2016.

Sec. 504.304. MEMBERS OF UNITED STATES ARMED FORCES AUXILIARIES. (a) The department shall issue specialty license plates for members of:

(1) the United States Air Force Auxiliary, Civil Air Patrol;

(2) the United States Coast Guard Auxiliary; and

(3) the Marine Corps League or its auxiliary.

(b) The license plates must include the words "Texas Wing Civil Air Patrol," the words "Coast Guard Auxiliary," or the emblem of the Marine Corps League and the words "Marine Corps League," as applicable.

(c) Repealed by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1166, Sec. 13, eff. September 1, 2007.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1320, Sec. 6, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1166 (H.B. 191), Sec. 13, eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 504.305. MEMBERS OF TEXAS NATIONAL GUARD, STATE GUARD, OR UNITED STATES ARMED FORCES RESERVES. (a) The department shall issue specialty license plates for:

(1) active members of the Texas National Guard or Texas State Guard;

(2) retired members of the Texas National Guard or Texas State Guard; and

(3) members of a reserve component of the United States armed forces.

(b) The department shall design the license plates in consultation with the adjutant general. The license plates must include the words "Texas Guard" or "Armed Forces Reserve," as applicable.

(c) Satisfactory proof of eligibility for a license plate issued under this section to a retired member of the Texas National Guard or Texas State Guard may be demonstrated by:

(1) a letter from the United States Department of Defense, the Department of the Army, or the Department of the Air Force stating that a retired guard member has 20 or more years of satisfactory federal service; or

(2) an identification card issued by the United States Department of Defense, the Department of the Army, or the Department of the Air Force indicating that the member is retired.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1320, Sec. 6, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1166 (H.B. 191), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 218 (H.B. 789), Sec. 2, eff. January 1, 2016.

Sec. 504.306. MEMBERS AND FORMER MEMBERS OF MERCHANT MARINE OF THE UNITED STATES. The department shall issue specialty license plates for members and former members of the merchant marine of the United States. The license plates must include the words "Merchant Marine."

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1320, Sec. 6, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1166 (H.B. 191), Sec. 4, eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1135 (H.B. 2741), Sec. 78, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 504.307. UNITED STATES PARATROOPERS. (a) The department shall issue specialty license plates for active and former members of the United States armed services who have:

(1) satisfactorily completed the prescribed proficiency tests while assigned or attached to an airborne unit or the Airborne Department of the United States Army Infantry School; or

(2) participated in at least one combat parachute jump.

(b) The license plates must include:

(1) a likeness of the parachutist badge authorized by the Department of the Army; and

(2) the words "U.S. Paratrooper."

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1320, Sec. 6, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1166 (H.B. 191), Sec. 13, eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1215 (S.B. 461), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2011.

Sec. 504.308. DISTINGUISHED FLYING CROSS MEDAL RECIPIENTS. The department shall issue specialty license plates for persons who have received the Distinguished Flying Cross medal and Distinguished Flying Cross medal with Valor. The license plates must bear a depiction of the Distinguished Flying Cross medal and the words "Distinguished Flying Cross" at the bottom of each license plate. License plates issued under this section to recipients of the Distinguished Flying Cross medal with Valor that are not personalized must also include the letter "V" as a prefix or suffix to the numerals on each plate.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1320, Sec. 6, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1166 (H.B. 191), Sec. 13, eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 958 (S.B. 1944), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2017.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1142 (H.B. 377), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 504.309. MILITARY ACADEMY LICENSE PLATES. The department shall issue specialty license plates for persons who:

(1) are graduates of:

(A) the United States Military Academy;

(B) the United States Naval Academy;

(C) the United States Air Force Academy;

(D) the United States Merchant Marine Academy; or

(E) the United States Coast Guard Academy; and

(2) are current or former commissioned officers of the United States armed forces.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1320, Sec. 6, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1166 (H.B. 191), Sec. 5, eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 397 (S.B. 165), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 504.310. WORLD WAR II VETERANS AND CERTAIN MEDAL RECIPIENTS. (a) The department shall issue specialty license plates for persons who served in the United States or Allied armed forces during World War II. License plates issued under this subsection must include the words "WWII Veteran."

(b) The department shall issue specialty license plates for recipients of the Army of Occupation Medal. License plates issued under this subsection must include the Army of Occupation Medal emblem and must include the words "Army of Occupation Medal" at the bottom of the plate.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1320, Sec. 6, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1166 (H.B. 191), Sec. 6, eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 67 (S.B. 225), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 504.311. SERVICE IN KOREA. (a) The department shall issue specialty license plates for persons who served in the United States armed forces:

(1) during the period beginning on June 27, 1950, and ending on July 27, 1954, and who received the National Defense Service Medal;

(2) in a combat zone in Korea during the period beginning on June 27, 1950, and ending on July 27, 1954, and who received the Korean Service Medal; or

(3) in the Korean Demilitarized Zone beginning on July 28, 1954, and who received the Korean Defense Service Medal.

(b) License plates issued under this section must include the words "Korea Veteran" and bear a depiction of the appropriate medal.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1320, Sec. 6, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1166 (H.B. 191), Sec. 7, eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 716 (H.B. 1273), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 504.312. VIETNAM VETERANS. (a) The department shall issue specialty license plates for persons who served in the United States armed forces:

(1) during the period beginning on January 1, 1961, and ending on August 14, 1974, and who received the National Defense Service Medal; or

(2) in a combat zone in the Republic of Vietnam during the period beginning on July 1, 1958, and ending on March 28, 1973, and who received the Vietnam Service Medal.

(b) License plates issued under this section must include the words "Vietnam Veteran" and bear a depiction of the appropriate medal.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1320, Sec. 6, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1166 (H.B. 191), Sec. 8, eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 716 (H.B. 1273), Sec. 4, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 504.313. DESERT SHIELD OR DESERT STORM VETERANS. (a) The department shall issue specialty license plates for persons who served in the United States armed forces:

(1) during the period beginning on August 2, 1990, and ending on November 30, 1995, and who received the National Defense Service Medal; or

(2) in a combat zone in support of Operation Desert Shield or Desert Storm during the period beginning on August 2, 1990, and ending on November 30, 1995, and who received the Southwest Asia Service Medal.

(b) License plates issued under this section must include the words "Desert Shield/Storm/Provide Comfort" and bear a depiction of the appropriate medal.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1320, Sec. 6, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1166 (H.B. 191), Sec. 9, eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 716 (H.B. 1273), Sec. 5, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 504.3135. OPERATION IRAQI FREEDOM. The department shall issue specialty license plates for persons who served in the United States armed forces and participated in Operation Iraqi Freedom. License plates issued under this section must include the words "Operation Iraqi Freedom."

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1320, Sec. 6, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 575 (H.B. 1480), Sec. 1(a), eff. September 1, 2005.

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1166 (H.B. 191), Sec. 10, eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 504.314. ENDURING FREEDOM VETERANS. (a) The department shall issue specialty license plates for persons who served in the United States armed services and participated in Operation Enduring Freedom. The license plates must include the words "Enduring Freedom."

(b) The department shall issue specialty license plates for persons who served in the United States armed services and participated in Operation Enduring Freedom in Afghanistan. The license plates must include the words "Enduring Freedom Afghanistan."

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1320, Sec. 6, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1166 (H.B. 191), Sec. 11, eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1327 (S.B. 597), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 504.315. MILITARY SPECIALTY LICENSE PLATES FOR EXTRAORDINARY SERVICE. (a) The department shall issue specialty license plates for recipients of the Bronze Star Medal and Bronze Star Medal with Valor. License plates issued under this subsection must include the Bronze Star Medal emblem and must include the words "Bronze Star Medal" at the bottom of each plate. License plates issued under this subsection to recipients of the Bronze Star Medal with Valor that are not personalized must also include the letter "V" as a prefix or suffix to the numerals on each plate.

(a-1) The department shall issue specialty license plates for recipients of the Air Medal and Air Medal with Valor. License plates issued under this subsection must include the Air Medal emblem and must include the words "Air Medal" at the bottom of each plate. License plates issued under this subsection to recipients of the Air Medal with Valor that are not personalized must also include the letter "V" as a prefix or suffix to the numerals on each plate. Section 504.702 does not apply to license plates authorized by this subsection.

(b) The department shall issue specialty license plates for recipients of the Distinguished Service Medal. License plates issued under this subsection must include the Distinguished Service Medal emblem and the words "Distinguished Service Medal" at the bottom of each plate.

(c) The department shall issue specialty license plates for recipients of the Commendation Medal or Commendation Medal with Valor for each branch of the military and for joint service. License plates issued under this subsection must include the appropriate Commendation Medal emblem and must include the name of the medal at the bottom of each plate. License plates issued under this subsection to recipients of the Commendation Medal with Valor that are not personalized must also include the letter "V" as a prefix or suffix to the numerals on each plate.

(d) The department shall issue specialty license plates for survivors of the attack on Pearl Harbor on December 7, 1941. The license plates must include the words "Pearl Harbor Survivor." A person is eligible if the person:

(1) served in the United States armed forces;

(2) was stationed in the Hawaiian Islands on December 7, 1941; and

(3) survived the attack on Pearl Harbor on December 7, 1941.

(e) The department shall issue specialty license plates to a recipient of a Congressional Medal of Honor awarded under Title 10, United States Code. The department shall assign the license plate number, and the plates may not be personalized.

(f) The department shall issue specialty license plates for recipients of the Air Force Cross or Distinguished Service Cross, the Army Distinguished Service Cross, the Navy Cross, or the Medal of Honor. The license plates must include the words "Legion of Valor."

(g) The department shall issue specialty license plates for recipients of the Purple Heart. License plates issued under this subsection must include:

(1) the Purple Heart emblem;

(2) the words "Purple Heart" at the bottom of each plate; and

(3) the letters "PH" as a prefix or suffix to the numerals on the plate if the plate is not personalized.

(h) The department shall issue special license plates for recipients of the Silver Star Medal. License plates issued under this subsection must include the Silver Star Medal emblem and must include the words "Silver Star Medal" at the bottom of each plate.

(i) A vehicle registered under this section must be for the use of the applicant who qualifies under this section.

(j) The department shall issue specialty license plates for recipients of the Defense Meritorious Service Medal. License plates issued under this subsection must include the Defense Meritorious Service Medal emblem and must include the words "Defense Meritorious Service Medal" at the bottom of each plate.

(k) The department shall issue specialty license plates for recipients of the Meritorious Service Medal. License plates issued under this subsection must include the Meritorious Service Medal emblem and must include the words "Meritorious Service Medal" at the bottom of each plate.

(l) The department shall issue specialty license plates for recipients of the Coast Guard Medal. License plates issued under this subsection must include the Coast Guard Medal emblem and must include the words "Coast Guard Medal" at the bottom of each plate.

(m) The department shall issue specialty license plates for recipients of the Airman's Medal. License plates issued under this subsection must include the Airman's Medal emblem and must include the words "Airman's Medal" at the bottom of each plate.

(n) The department shall issue specialty license plates for recipients of the Soldier's Medal. License plates issued under this subsection must include the Soldier's Medal emblem and must include the words "Soldier's Medal" at the bottom of each plate.

(o) The department shall issue specialty license plates for recipients of the Navy and Marine Corps Medal. License plates issued under this subsection must include the Navy and Marine Corps Medal emblem and must include the words "Navy and Marine Corps Medal" at the bottom of each plate.

(p) The department shall issue specialty license plates for recipients of the Prisoner of War Medal. License plates issued under this subsection must include the Prisoner of War Medal emblem and must include the words "Prisoner of War Medal" at the bottom of each plate.

(q) The department shall issue specialty license plates for recipients of the Military Outstanding Volunteer Service Medal. License plates issued under this subsection must include the Military Outstanding Volunteer Service Medal emblem and must include the words "Military Outstanding Volunteer Service Medal" at the bottom of each plate.

(r) The department shall issue specialty license plates for recipients of the Borinqueneers Congressional Gold Medal. License plates issued under this subsection must include the Borinqueneers Congressional Gold Medal emblem and must include the words "Borinqueneers Congressional Gold Medal" at the bottom of each plate. License plates issued under this subsection that are not personalized must also include the letter "B" as a prefix or suffix to the numerals on each plate.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1320, Sec. 6, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 358 (S.B. 274), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1166 (H.B. 191), Sec. 12, eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1166 (H.B. 191), Sec. 13, eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 87 (S.B. 1969), Sec. 27.001(103), eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 460 (S.B. 1755), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 709 (H.B. 559), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1296 (H.B. 2357), Sec. 182, eff. January 1, 2012.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 161 (S.B. 1093), Sec. 22.001(51), eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 223 (H.B. 120), Sec. 4, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 223 (H.B. 120), Sec. 5, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 223 (H.B. 120), Sec. 6, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1010 (H.B. 2485), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 34 (S.B. 193), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 716 (H.B. 1273), Sec. 6, eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 716 (H.B. 1273), Sec. 7, eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1028 (H.B. 1364), Sec. 1, eff. January 1, 2016.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 324 (S.B. 1488), Sec. 24.001(51), eff. September 1, 2017.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 324 (S.B. 1488), Sec. 24.001(52), eff. September 1, 2017.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 914 (S.B. 1371), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2017.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 449 (H.B. 912), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2021.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 480 (H.B. 659), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 504.316. LEGION OF MERIT MEDAL RECIPIENTS. (a) The department shall issue specialty license plates for persons who have received the Legion of Merit medal. The license plates must include the words "Legion of Merit."

(b) Repealed by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1296, Sec. 247(10), eff. January 1, 2012.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 317 (H.B. 2282), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2007.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1296 (H.B. 2357), Sec. 247(10), eff. January 1, 2012.

Sec. 504.3161. MILITARY SPECIALTY LICENSE PLATES FOR RECIPIENTS OF CERTAIN MILITARY CAMPAIGN AND SERVICE AWARDS. The department shall issue specialty license plates for recipients of the following military awards that include the name of the award:

(1) the Armed Forces Expeditionary Medal;

(2) the Armed Forces Service Medal;

(3) the Navy Expeditionary Medal;

(4) the Global War on Terrorism Expeditionary Medal;

(5) the Global War on Terrorism Service Medal;

(6) the Marine Corps Expeditionary Medal;

(7) the Merchant Marine Expeditionary Medal;

(8) the Kosovo Campaign Medal;

(9) the Inherent Resolve Campaign Medal;

(10) the China Service Medal; and

(11) the Nuclear Deterrence Operations Service Medal.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1084 (H.B. 3521), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2017.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 651 (S.B. 1806), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2019.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 746 (H.B. 819), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2019.

Reenacted and amended by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 915 (H.B. 3607), Sec. 20.005, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 504.317. SURVIVING SPOUSES OF DISABLED VETERANS SPECIALTY LICENSE PLATES. (a) In this section, "surviving spouse" means the individual married to a disabled veteran at the time of the veteran's death.

(b) The department shall issue specialty license plates for surviving spouses of disabled veterans of the United States armed forces.

(b-1) A person is eligible to receive specialty license plates under this section if the person is the surviving spouse of a person who had been entitled to specialty plates for veterans with disabilities under Section 504.202, regardless of whether the deceased spouse was issued plates under that section.

(c) A person entitled to specialty license plates under this section may register, for the person's own use, one vehicle without payment of any fee other than the fee for the license plates under Subsection (d).

(d) The fee for the first set of license plates is $3. There is no fee for each additional set of license plates.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 845 (H.B. 3580), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2011.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1296 (H.B. 2357), Sec. 183, eff. January 1, 2012.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 941 (H.B. 1678), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 548 (S.B. 441), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2017.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1142 (H.B. 377), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 504.318. WOMEN VETERANS. The department shall issue specialty license plates for female active or former members of the United States armed forces, Texas National Guard, or Texas State Guard. The license plates must include the words "Woman Veteran" in red.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1281 (H.B. 1178), Sec. 4, eff. June 17, 2011.

Redesignated from Transportation Code, Section 504.317 by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 161 (S.B. 1093), Sec. 22.001(52), eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 504.319. DEFENSE SUPERIOR SERVICE MEDAL RECIPIENTS. The department shall issue specialty license plates for recipients of the Defense Superior Service Medal. License plates issued under this section must include the words "Defense Superior Service Medal" at the bottom of each plate.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 223 (H.B. 120), Sec. 7, eff. September 1, 2013.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 432 (S.B. 563), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 504.320. RECIPIENTS OF CERTAIN COMBAT BADGES, MEDALS, OR RIBBONS. (a) The department shall issue specialty license plates for recipients of the Combat Action Badge. License plates issued under this subsection must include the Combat Action Badge emblem and must include the words "Combat Action Badge" at the bottom of each plate.

(b) The department shall issue specialty license plates for recipients of the Combat Action Medal. License plates issued under this subsection must include the Combat Action Medal emblem and must include the words "Combat Action Medal" at the bottom of each plate.

(c) The department shall issue specialty license plates for recipients of the Combat Action Ribbon. License plates issued under this subsection must include the Combat Action Ribbon emblem and must include the words "Combat Action Ribbon" at the bottom of each plate.

(c-1) The department shall issue specialty license plates for recipients of the Combat Medical Badge. License plates issued under this subsection must include the Combat Medical Badge emblem and must include the words "Combat Medical Badge" at the bottom of each plate.

(c-2) The department shall issue specialty license plates for recipients of the Combat Infantryman Badge. License plates issued under this subsection must include the Combat Infantryman Badge emblem and must include the words "Combat Infantryman Badge" at the bottom of each plate.

(d) A specialty license plate issued under this section for a badge or ribbon that may be awarded more than once shall include only the emblem of the first award badge or ribbon.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 708 (H.B. 1128), Sec. 2, eff. January 1, 2016.

Amended by:

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 274 (H.B. 2115), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2017.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 274 (H.B. 2115), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2017.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 577 (S.B. 769), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2017.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 577 (S.B. 769), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2017.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 835 (H.B. 2643), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 504.322. 36TH INFANTRY DIVISION. The department shall issue specialty license plates for persons who have served in the 36th Infantry Division of the Texas Army National Guard. The license plates must include the 36th Infantry Division emblem and must include the words "36th Infantry Division" at the bottom of each plate.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1012 (H.B. 923), Sec. 2, eff. January 1, 2016.

Redesignated from Transportation Code, Section 504.320 by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 324 (S.B. 1488), Sec. 24.001(54), eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 504.323. 11TH ARMORED CAVALRY REGIMENT. The department shall issue specialty license plates for persons who have served in the 11th Armored Cavalry Regiment of the United States Army. The license plates must include the 11th Armored Cavalry Regiment emblem and must include the words "11th Armored Cavalry Regiment" at the bottom of each plate.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1085 (H.B. 3567), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 504.324. TOMB GUARD. The department shall issue specialty license plates for persons who serve or have served in the Third United States Infantry Regiment as a guard for the Tomb of the Unknown Soldier and are awarded the Guard, Tomb of the Unknown Soldier Identification Badge. The license plates must include a likeness of the Guard, Tomb of the Unknown Soldier Identification Badge and must include the words "Tomb Guard" at the bottom of each plate.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 274 (H.B. 2115), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2017.

Redesignated from Transportation Code, Section 504.323 by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 467 (H.B. 4170), Sec. 21.001(64), eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 504.325. MASTER ARMY AVIATOR. The department shall issue specialty license plates for persons awarded the Master Army Aviator Badge. The license plates must include:

(1) the words "Master Army Aviator"; and

(2) a depiction of the Master Army Aviator Badge.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 186 (H.B. 2039), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 504.326. 173RD AIRBORNE BRIGADE. The department shall issue specialty license plates for persons who have served in the 173rd Airborne Brigade of the United States Army. The license plates must include the 173rd Airborne Brigade emblem and must include the words "173rd Airborne Brigade" at the bottom of each plate.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 128 (H.B. 1656), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2019.

Redesignated from Transportation Code, Section 504.325 by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 915 (H.B. 3607), Sec. 21.001(107), eff. September 1, 2021.

Text of section as added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 18 (H.B. 1081), Sec. 2

For text of section as added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 130 (H.B. 3401), Sec. 2, see other Sec. 504.327.

For text of section as added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 302 (S.B. 791), Sec. 1, see other Sec. 504.327.

For text of section as added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 326 (H.B. 1936), Sec. 2, see other Sec. 504.327.

Sec. 504.327. PRESIDENTIAL SERVICE BADGE. The department shall issue specialty license plates for persons awarded the Presidential Service Badge. The license plates must include:

(1) the words "Presidential Service Badge"; and

(2) a depiction of the Presidential Service Badge.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 18 (H.B. 1081), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 504.328. UNITED STATES NAVY SEALS. The department shall issue specialty license plates for members of the United States armed services who have been awarded the Special Warfare Insignia. The license plates must include:

(1) the words "Navy SEALs"; and

(2) a depiction of the United States Navy Special Warfare Insignia.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 130 (H.B. 3401), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2021.

Redesignated from Transportation Code, Section 504.327 by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 768 (H.B. 4595), Sec. 24.001(54), eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 504.329. UNITED STATES NAVY SUBMARINE SERVICE. The department shall issue specialty license plates for persons who served on a submarine while in the United States Navy. The license plates must include:

(1) the words "U.S. Navy Submarine Service" in red letters at the bottom of each plate; and

(2) a depiction of the Submarine Warfare insignia on the left side of the plate.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 302 (S.B. 791), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2021.

Redesignated from Transportation Code, Section 504.327 by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 768 (H.B. 4595), Sec. 24.001(55), eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 504.330. UNITED STATES ARMY SPECIAL FORCES. The department shall issue specialty license plates for persons who serve or have served in the United States armed services and have earned Special Forces qualifications. The license plates must include:

(1) the words "Army Special Forces"; and

(2) a depiction of the United States Army Special Forces shoulder sleeve insignia with the Special Forces Tab.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 326 (H.B. 1936), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2021.

Redesignated from Transportation Code, Section 504.327 by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 768 (H.B. 4595), Sec. 24.001(56), eff. September 1, 2023.

Text of section as added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1050 (S.B. 280), Sec. 3

For text of section as added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 385 (H.B. 282), Sec. 2, see other Sec. 504.331.

For text of section as added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 506 (H.B. 2503), Sec. 2, see other Sec. 504.331.

Sec. 504.331. OPERATION FREEDOM'S SENTINEL. The department shall issue specialty license plates for persons who served in the United States armed services and participated in Operation Freedom's Sentinel. The license plates must include the words "Freedom's Sentinel."

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1050 (S.B. 280), Sec. 3, eff. June 18, 2023.

Text of section as added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 385 (H.B. 282), Sec. 2

For text of section as added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 506 (H.B. 2503), Sec. 2, see other Sec. 504.331.

For text of section as added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1050 (S.B. 280), Sec. 3, see other Sec. 504.331.

Sec. 504.331. TEXAS HOMELAND DEFENSE SERVICE MEDAL. The department shall issue specialty license plates for recipients of the Texas Homeland Defense Service Medal. The license plates must include the Texas Homeland Defense Service Medal emblem and must include the words "Texas Homeland Defense Service Medal" at the bottom of each plate.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 385 (H.B. 282), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2023.

Text of section as added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 506 (H.B. 2503), Sec. 2

For text of section as added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 385 (H.B. 282), Sec. 2, see other Sec. 504.331.

For text of section as added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1050 (S.B. 280), Sec. 3, see other Sec. 504.331.

Sec. 504.331. TEXAS HUMANITARIAN SERVICE MEDAL. The department shall issue specialty license plates for recipients of the Texas Humanitarian Service Medal. The license plates must include:

(1) the words "Texas Humanitarian Service Medal"; and

(2) a depiction of the Texas Humanitarian Service Medal emblem.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 506 (H.B. 2503), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2023.

Text of section as added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 385 (H.B. 282), Sec. 2

For text of section as added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 506 (H.B. 2503), Sec. 2, see other Sec. 504.332.

Sec. 504.332. TEXAS SUPERIOR SERVICE MEDAL. The department shall issue specialty license plates for recipients of the Texas Superior Service Medal. The license plates must include the Texas Superior Service Medal emblem and must include the words "Texas Superior Service Medal" at the bottom of each plate.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 385 (H.B. 282), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2023.

Text of section as added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 506 (H.B. 2503), Sec. 2

For text of section as added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 385 (H.B. 282), Sec. 2, see other Sec. 504.332.

Sec. 504.332. FEDERAL HUMANITARIAN SERVICE MEDAL. The department shall issue specialty license plates for recipients of the federal Humanitarian Service Medal. The license plates must include:

(1) the words "Humanitarian Service Medal"; and

(2) a depiction of the federal Humanitarian Service Medal emblem.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 506 (H.B. 2503), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 504.333. LONE STAR DISTINGUISHED SERVICE MEDAL. The department shall issue specialty license plates for recipients of the Lone Star Distinguished Service Medal. The license plates must include the Lone Star Distinguished Service Medal emblem and must include the words "Lone Star Distinguished Service Medal" at the bottom of each plate.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 385 (H.B. 282), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 504.334. TEXAS OUTSTANDING SERVICE MEDAL. The department shall issue specialty license plates for recipients of the Texas Outstanding Service Medal. The license plates must include the Texas Outstanding Service Medal emblem and must include the words "Texas Outstanding Service Medal" at the bottom of each plate.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 385 (H.B. 282), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 504.335. TEXAS MEDAL OF MERIT. The department shall issue specialty license plates for recipients of the Texas Medal of Merit. The license plates must include the Texas Medal of Merit emblem and must include the words "Texas Medal of Merit" at the bottom of each plate.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 385 (H.B. 282), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2023.

SUBCHAPTER E. SPECIALTY LICENSE PLATES WITH RESTRICTED DISTRIBUTION

Sec. 504.400. FEES FOR CERTAIN RESTRICTED PLATES. The department shall issue, without charge, not more than three sets of specialty license plates under this subchapter.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1296 (H.B. 2357), Sec. 184, eff. January 1, 2012.

Sec. 504.401. STATE OFFICIALS. (a) The department shall issue specialty license plates to a state official.

(b) Repealed by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1296, Sec. 247(11), eff. January 1, 2012.

(c) The registration remains valid until December 31 of each year.

(d) In this section, "state official" means:

(1) a member of the legislature;

(2) the governor;

(3) the lieutenant governor;

(4) a justice of the supreme court;

(5) a judge of the court of criminal appeals;

(6) the attorney general;

(7) the commissioner of the General Land Office;

(8) the comptroller;

(9) a member of the Railroad Commission of Texas;

(10) the commissioner of agriculture;

(11) the secretary of state; or

(12) a member of the State Board of Education.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1320, Sec. 6, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1296 (H.B. 2357), Sec. 185, eff. January 1, 2012.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1296 (H.B. 2357), Sec. 247(11), eff. January 1, 2012.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1251 (S.B. 1914), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 504.402. MEMBERS OF CONGRESS. (a) The department shall issue specialty license plates to members of congress, which must include the words "U.S. Congress."

(b) Repealed by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1296, Sec. 247(12), eff. January 1, 2012.

(c) The license plates remain valid until December 31 of each year.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1320, Sec. 6, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1296 (H.B. 2357), Sec. 186, eff. January 1, 2012.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1296 (H.B. 2357), Sec. 247(12), eff. January 1, 2012.

Sec. 504.403. STATE AND FEDERAL JUDGES.

Without reference to the amendment of this subsection, this section was repealed by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1290 (H.B. 2017), Sec 44(a)(4), eff. September 1, 2011.

(a) The department shall issue specialty license plates for a current or visiting state or federal judge. The license plates must include the words "State Judge" or "U.S. Judge," as appropriate.

(b) Repealed by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1290, Sec. 44(a)(4), eff. September 1, 2011.

(c) Repealed by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1290, Sec. 44(a)(4), eff. September 1, 2011.

(d) In this section:

(1) Repealed by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1290, Sec. 44(a)(4), eff. September 1, 2011.

Without reference to the amendment of this subdivision, this section was repealed by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1290 (H.B. 2017), Sec 44(a)(4), eff. September 1, 2011.

(2) "State judge" means:

(A) a justice of the supreme court;

(B) a judge of the court of criminal appeals;

(C) a judge of a court of appeals of this state;

(D) a district court judge;

(E) a presiding judge of an administrative judicial district; or

(F) a statutory county court judge.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1320, Sec. 6, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1290 (H.B. 2017), Sec. 44(a)(4), eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1296 (H.B. 2357), Sec. 187, eff. January 1, 2012.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1296 (H.B. 2357), Sec. 188, eff. January 1, 2012.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1296 (H.B. 2357), Sec. 247(13), eff. January 1, 2012.

Sec. 504.404. FEDERAL ADMINISTRATIVE LAW JUDGES.

Without reference to the amendment of this subsection, this section was repealed by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1290 (H.B. 2017), Sec 44(a)(4), eff. September 1, 2011.

(a) The department shall issue specialty license plates to current federal administrative law judges that bear the words "U.S. A. L. Judge."

(b) Repealed by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1290, Sec 44(a)(4), eff. September 1, 2011.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1320, Sec. 6, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1290 (H.B. 2017), Sec. 44(a)(4), eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1296 (H.B. 2357), Sec. 189, eff. January 1, 2012.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1296 (H.B. 2357), Sec. 247(14), eff. January 1, 2012.

Sec. 504.405. COUNTY JUDGES. (a) The department shall issue specialty license plates for current county judges of this state that bear the words "County Judge."

(b) Repealed by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1296, Sec. 247(15), eff. January 1, 2012.

(c) In this section, "county judge" means the judge of the county court established by Section 15, Article V, Texas Constitution.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1320, Sec. 6, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1296 (H.B. 2357), Sec. 190, eff. January 1, 2012.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1296 (H.B. 2357), Sec. 247(15), eff. January 1, 2012.

Without reference to the amendment of this section, this section was repealed by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1290 (H.B. 2017), Sec. 44(a)(4), eff. September 1, 2011.

Sec. 504.406. TEXAS CONSTABLES. The department shall issue specialty license plates for Texas constables that bear the words "Texas Constable."

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1320, Sec. 6, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1290 (H.B. 2017), Sec. 44(a)(4), eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1296 (H.B. 2357), Sec. 191, eff. January 1, 2012.

Sec. 504.4061. FOREIGN ORGANIZATION VEHICLES. (a) The department shall issue specialty license plates for an instrumentality established by a foreign government recognized by the United States before January 1, 1979, that is without official representation or diplomatic relations with the United States. The license plates must include the words "Foreign Organization" and shall remain valid for seven years.

(b) A person entitled to specialty license plates under this section may register the vehicle without payment of any fee paid for or at the time of registration.

Redesignated and amended from Transportation Code, Section 504.412 by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1296 (H.B. 2357), Sec. 192, eff. January 1, 2012.

Sec. 504.414. PROFESSIONAL FIREFIGHTER PLATES. (a) The professional firefighter plate may be issued to qualified firefighters. The sponsor of the plate may nominate a state agency for receipt of funds under Section 504.801(e)(2)(A).

(b) After deduction of the department's administrative costs in accordance with Section 504.801, the remainder of the fees from the sale of professional firefighter plates shall be deposited to the credit of an account in the state treasury to be used by the nominated state agency for the purpose of making grants to support the activities of an organization of professional firefighters located in this state that provides emergency relief and college scholarship funds to the professional firefighters and their dependents.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 712 (H.B. 2854), Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 2009.

Sec. 504.415. VEHICLES CARRYING MOBILE AMATEUR RADIO EQUIPMENT. The department shall issue specialty license plates for a person who holds an amateur radio station license issued by the Federal Communications Commission and who operates receiving and transmitting mobile amateur radio equipment. The license plates shall include the person's amateur call letters as assigned by the Federal Communications Commission. A person may register more than one vehicle equipped with mobile amateur radio equipment under this section, and the department shall issue license plates that include the same amateur call letters for each vehicle.

Transferred and redesignated from Transportation Code, Section 504.509 by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1296 (H.B. 2357), Sec. 193, eff. January 1, 2012.

Sec. 504.416. STAR OF TEXAS AWARD RECIPIENTS. (a) The department shall issue specialty license plates for persons who are recipients of a Star of Texas Award under Chapter 3106, Government Code. The license plates must include the Star of Texas Award emblem and the words "Star of Texas."

(b) The surviving spouse of a person who was the posthumous recipient of an award described by Subsection (a) is entitled to specialty license plates issued under this section.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 126 (H.B. 979), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2017.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 477 (H.B. 627), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 504.417. ANTARCTICA SERVICE MEDAL RECIPIENTS. The department shall issue specialty license plates for recipients of the Antarctica Service Medal. License plates issued under this section must include the Antarctica Service Medal emblem and the words "Antarctica Service Medal" at the bottom of each plate.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 585 (H.B. 2921), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2023.

SUBCHAPTER F. SPECIALTY LICENSE PLATES WITH RESTRICTED DISTRIBUTION AND REGULAR LICENSE PLATE FEES

Sec. 504.501. CLASSIC MOTOR VEHICLES AND TRAVEL TRAILERS; CUSTOM VEHICLES; STREET RODS. (a) The department shall issue specialty license plates for a motor vehicle that is at least 25 years old or is a custom vehicle or street rod. The license plates must include the word or words "Classic," "Custom Vehicle," or "Street Rod," or a similar designation, as appropriate.

(b) A person eligible for the license plates may instead use license plates that are:

(1) embossed with an alphanumeric pattern;

(2) of a plate design that was issued by this state in the same year as the model year of the vehicle; and

(3) approved for use by the department.

(b-1) The department may require the attachment of a registration insignia to a license plate described by Subsection (b) in a manner that does not affect the display of information originally on the license plate.

(c) There is no fee for issuance or approval of license plates under this section.

(d) Notwithstanding Chapter 547, a custom vehicle or street rod eligible to receive license plates under this section is not required to be equipped with a specific piece of equipment unless the specific piece of equipment was required by statute as a condition of sale during the year listed as the model year on the certificate of title.

(e) On initial registration of a custom vehicle or street rod, the owner must provide proof, acceptable to the department, that the custom vehicle or street rod passed a safety inspection that has been approved by the department. The department shall create a safety inspection process for inspecting custom vehicles and street rods.

(f) In this section:

(1) "Custom vehicle" means a vehicle:

(A) that is:

(i) at least 25 years old and of a model year after 1948; or

(ii) manufactured to resemble a vehicle that is at least 25 years old and of a model year after 1948; and

(B) that:

(i) has been altered from the manufacturer's original design; or

(ii) has a body constructed from materials not original to the vehicle.

(2) "Street rod" means a vehicle:

(A) that was manufactured:

(i) before 1949; or

(ii) after 1948 to resemble a vehicle manufactured before 1949; and

(B) that:

(i) has been altered from the manufacturer's original design; or

(ii) has a body constructed from materials not original to the vehicle.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1320, Sec. 6, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1136 (H.B. 2553), Sec. 32, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 729 (H.B. 890), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 729 (H.B. 890), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1296 (H.B. 2357), Sec. 195(a), eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 876 (H.B. 3068), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 504.502. CERTAIN EXHIBITION VEHICLES. (a) The department shall issue specialty license plates for a passenger car, truck, motorcycle, bus, or former military vehicle that:

(1) is at least 25 years old, if the vehicle is a passenger car, truck, motorcycle, or bus;

(2) is a collector's item;

(3) is used exclusively for exhibitions, club activities, parades, and other functions of public interest and is not used for regular transportation; and

(4) does not carry advertising.

(b) The license plates must include the words "Antique Auto," "Antique Truck," "Antique Motorcycle," "Antique Bus," or "Military Vehicle," as appropriate.

(c) A person eligible for the license plates may instead use license plates that are:

(1) embossed with an alphanumeric pattern;

(2) of a plate design that was issued by this state in the same year as the model year of the vehicle, provided that a passenger car must bear passenger car or truck license plates and a truck must bear passenger car or truck license plates; and

(3) approved for use by the department.

(c-1) The department may require attachment of a registration insignia to a license plate described by Subsection (c) in a manner that does not affect the display of information originally on the license plate.

(d) License plates issued or approved under this section expire on the fifth anniversary of the date of issuance or approval.

(e) The fee for issuance or approval of license plates under this section is:

(1) $10 for each year or portion of a year remaining in the five-year registration period if the vehicle was manufactured in 1921 or later; or

(2) $8 for each year or portion of a year remaining in the five-year registration period if the vehicle was manufactured before 1921.

(f) The department may exempt a former military vehicle from the requirement to display a license plate or registration insignia if the exemption is necessary to maintain the vehicle's accurate military markings. The department may approve an alternative registration insignia that is compatible with the vehicle's original markings.

(g) A person entitled to specialty license plates or to department approval under this section may register the vehicle without payment of any fees paid for or at the time of registration except the fee for the license plate.

(h) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a vehicle issued license plates under Subsection (a) shall be required to attach and display only one license plate on the rear of the vehicle.

(i) In this section, "former military vehicle" means a vehicle, including a trailer, regardless of the vehicle's size, weight, or year of manufacture, that:

(1) was manufactured for use in any country's military forces;

(2) is maintained to represent its military design and markings accurately; and

(3) is not operated on continuous tracks.

(j) Repealed by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1296, Sec. 247(16), eff. January 1, 2012.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1320, Sec. 6, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1318 (H.B. 3425), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2005.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1296 (H.B. 2357), Sec. 196, eff. January 1, 2012.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1296 (H.B. 2357), Sec. 247(16), eff. January 1, 2012.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 508 (H.B. 792), Sec. 1, eff. January 1, 2016.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 324 (S.B. 1488), Sec. 18.002, eff. September 1, 2017.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 876 (H.B. 3068), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2019.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1079 (H.B. 1755), Sec. 9, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 504.503. MUNICIPAL, MOTOR, AND PRIVATE BUSES. The department shall issue without charge specialty license plates for municipal buses, motor buses, and private buses. The license plates must include the words "City Bus," "Motor Bus," or "Private Bus," as appropriate.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1320, Sec. 6, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1296 (H.B. 2357), Sec. 197, eff. January 1, 2012.

Sec. 504.505. COTTON VEHICLES. (a) The department shall issue specialty license plates for a single motor vehicle that is:

(1) used only to transport chile pepper modules, seed cotton, cotton, cotton burrs, or equipment used in transporting or processing chile peppers or cotton; and

(2) not more than 10 feet in width.

(b) The license plates must include the words "Cotton Vehicle."

(c) There is no fee for issuance of the license plates. The license plates may be renewed without payment of a fee.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1320, Sec. 6, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 247 (H.B. 749), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2005.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1136 (H.B. 2553), Sec. 33, eff. September 1, 2011.

Sec. 504.506. LOG LOADER VEHICLES. (a) The department shall issue specialty license plates for a vehicle that is temporarily operated on public highways, during daylight hours only, and on which machinery is mounted solely to load logs on other vehicles.

(b) The fee for issuance of the license plates is $62.50.

(c) A person entitled to specialty license plates under this section may register the vehicle without payment of any fee paid for or at the time of registration other than the fee for the license plates.

(d) A vehicle having a license plate issued under this section is exempt from the inspection requirements of Chapter 548.

(e) This section does not apply to a vehicle used to haul logs.

(f) Repealed by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1296, Sec. 247(17), eff. January 1, 2012.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1320, Sec. 6, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1296 (H.B. 2357), Sec. 198, eff. January 1, 2012.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1296 (H.B. 2357), Sec. 247(17), eff. January 1, 2012.

Sec. 504.507. FORESTRY VEHICLES. (a) The department shall issue specialty license plates for forestry vehicles. License plates issued under this section must include the words "Forestry Vehicle."

(b) There is no fee for issuance of the license plates. The department shall:

(1) collect any fee that a county imposes under this chapter for registration of a forestry vehicle; and

(2) send the fee to the appropriate county for disposition.

(c) Repealed by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1296, Sec. 247(18), eff. January 1, 2012.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1320, Sec. 6, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1136 (H.B. 2553), Sec. 34, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1296 (H.B. 2357), Sec. 247(18), eff. January 1, 2012.

Sec. 504.508. TOW TRUCKS. (a) The department shall issue specialty license plates for a commercial motor vehicle used as a tow truck. The license plates must include the words "Tow Truck." A vehicle used commercially as a tow truck shall display license plates issued under this section.

(b) There is no fee for issuance of the license plates.

(c) Proof of eligibility for license plates under this section must include a copy of the permit certificate issued by the Texas Department of Licensing and Regulation for the tow truck.

(d) Repealed by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1296, Sec. 247(19), eff. January 1, 2012.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1320, Sec. 6, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1046 (H.B. 2094), Sec. 3.05, eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1136 (H.B. 2553), Sec. 35, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1296 (H.B. 2357), Sec. 247(19), eff. January 1, 2012.

Sec. 504.511. PEACE OFFICERS WOUNDED OR KILLED IN LINE OF DUTY. (a) The department shall issue specialty license plates for:

(1) a person wounded in the line of duty as a peace officer; or

(2) a surviving spouse, parent, brother, sister, or adult child, including an adopted child or stepchild, of a person killed in the line of duty as a peace officer.

(b) License plates issued under this section must include the words "To Protect and Serve" above an insignia depicting a yellow rose superimposed over the outline of a badge.

(c) The fee for issuance of the license plates is $20.

(d) In this section, "peace officer" has the meaning assigned by Section 1.07, Penal Code.

Transferred and redesignated from Transportation Code, Section 504.407 by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1296 (H.B. 2357), Sec. 199, eff. January 1, 2012.

Sec. 504.5111. RETIRED PEACE OFFICERS. (a) In this section, "retired peace officer" means a person who was formerly employed as a peace officer, as defined by Section 1.07, Penal Code.

(b) The department shall design and issue specialty license plates for retired peace officers.

(c) There is no fee for the issuance of the license plates.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 511 (H.B. 2754), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 504.5115. CERTAIN PURPLE HEART RECIPIENTS. (a) The department shall issue specialty license plates for recipients of a Purple Heart awarded by the Department of Public Safety or another law enforcement agency in this state.

(b) The fee for issuance of one set of the license plates is $3.

(c) A person issued specialty license plates under this section shall be issued one set of the license plates without payment of the registration fee required under Chapter 502.

(d) The surviving spouse of a person who was the posthumous recipient of an award described by Subsection (a) is entitled to specialty license plates issued under this section.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 887 (H.B. 3343), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2019.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 477 (H.B. 627), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 504.512. GOLD STAR MOTHER, FATHER, SPOUSE, OR FAMILY MEMBER. (a) The department shall issue a specialty license plate for the mother, father, or surviving spouse or an immediate family member of a person who died while serving in the United States armed forces. License plates issued under this section must include the words "Gold Star Mother," "Gold Star Father," "Gold Star Spouse," or "Gold Star Family" and a gold star. A person may not be issued more than one set of the license plates at a time.

(a-1) In this section "immediate family member" means the parent, child, sibling, adoptive parent, adoptive child, foster parent, foster child, stepparent, or stepchild of a person who died while serving in the United States armed forces.

(b) Repealed by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 741 , Sec. 1, eff. January 1, 2016.

Transferred and redesignated from Transportation Code, Section 504.408 by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1296 (H.B. 2357), Sec. 199, eff. January 1, 2012.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 741 (H.B. 1702), Sec. 1, eff. January 1, 2016.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 385 (H.B. 282), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 504.513. FIREFIGHTERS. (a) The department shall issue specialty license plates for:

(1) volunteer firefighters certified by:

(A) the Texas Commission on Fire Protection; or

(B) the State Firemen's and Fire Marshals' Association of Texas; and

(2) fire protection personnel as that term is defined by Section 419.021, Government Code.

(b) A person may be issued not more than three sets of license plates.

Reenacted, transferred, redesignated and amended from Transportation Code, Section 504.409 by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1296 (H.B. 2357), Sec. 200, eff. January 1, 2012.

Sec. 504.514. EMERGENCY MEDICAL SERVICES PERSONNEL. (a) The department shall issue specialty license plates for emergency medical services personnel certified by the Department of State Health Services under Subchapter C, Chapter 773, Health and Safety Code.

(b) The fee for issuance of the license plates is $8.

(c) A person may be issued only one set of the license plates.

Transferred, redesignated and amended from Transportation Code, Section 504.410 by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1296 (H.B. 2357), Sec. 201, eff. January 1, 2012.

Sec. 504.515. HONORARY CONSULS. (a) The department shall issue specialty license plates for a person who is an honorary consul authorized by the United States to perform consular duties. License plates issued under this section must include the words "Honorary Consul."

(b) The fee for issuance of the license plates is $40.

Transferred and redesignated from Transportation Code, Section 504.411 by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1296 (H.B. 2357), Sec. 201, eff. January 1, 2012.

Sec. 504.516. RENTAL TRAILER OR TRAVEL TRAILER FEE: TRAILER OR SEMITRAILER. (a) The department may issue specially designed license plates for rental trailers and travel trailers that include, as appropriate, the words "rental trailer" or "travel trailer."

(b) In this section:

(1) "Rental fleet" means vehicles that are designated in the manner prescribed by the department as a rental fleet.

(2) "Rental trailer" means a utility trailer.

(3) "Travel trailer" has the meaning assigned by Section 501.002.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1296 (H.B. 2357), Sec. 202, eff. January 1, 2012.

Text of section as added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 516 (H.B. 2876), Sec. 1

For text of section as added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 661 (H.B. 108), Sec. 1, see other Sec. 504.517.

Sec. 504.517. INDUSTRIAL FIREFIGHTERS. (a) The department shall design and issue specialty license plates for industrial firefighters certified by the State Firefighters' and Fire Marshals' Association of Texas.

(b) The fee for issuance of the license plates is $30.

(c) A person may be issued not more than three sets of license plates.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 516 (H.B. 2876), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2023.

Text of section as added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 661 (H.B. 108), Sec. 1

For text of section as added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 516 (H.B. 2876), Sec. 1, see other Sec. 504.517.

Sec. 504.517. CLASSROOM TEACHERS. (a) In this section, "classroom teacher" has the meaning assigned by Section 5.001, Education Code.

(b) The department shall issue specialty license plates for classroom teachers with at least 15 years of service teaching public school students. The license plates must include the words "Texas Teacher" and depict a Texas public education logo. The department shall design the license plates in consultation with the Texas Education Agency.

(c) The fee for issuance of the license plates is $10.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 661 (H.B. 108), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 504.518. RETIRED CLASSROOM TEACHERS. (a) In this section, "retired classroom teacher" means a person who:

(1) was formerly employed as a classroom teacher, as that term is defined by Section 5.001, Education Code; and

(2) is a retiree of the Teacher Retirement System of Texas.

(b) The department shall issue specialty license plates for retired classroom teachers with at least 20 years of service teaching public school students. The license plates must include the words "Retired Texas Teacher" and depict a Texas public education logo. The department shall design the license plates in consultation with the Texas Education Agency.

(c) The fee for issuance of the license plates is $5.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 661 (H.B. 108), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2023.

SUBCHAPTER G. SPECIALTY LICENSE PLATES FOR GENERAL DISTRIBUTION

Sec. 504.601. GENERAL PROVISIONS APPLICABLE TO SPECIALTY LICENSE PLATES FOR GENERAL DISTRIBUTION. (a) Unless expressly provided by this subchapter or department rule:

(1) the fee for issuance of a license plate under this subchapter is $30; and

(2) of each fee received under this subchapter, the department shall use $8 to defray its administrative costs in complying with this subchapter.

(b) This section does not apply to a specialty license plate marketed and sold by a private vendor at the request of the specialty license plate sponsor under Section 504.6011.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1320, Sec. 6, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1381 (S.B. 1616), Sec. 4, eff. September 1, 2009.

Sec. 504.6011. GENERAL PROVISIONS APPLICABLE TO SPECIALTY LICENSE PLATES FOR GENERAL DISTRIBUTION SOLD THROUGH PRIVATE VENDOR. (a) The sponsor of a specialty license plate may contract with the private vendor authorized under Subchapter J for the marketing and sale of the specialty license plate.

(b) The fee for issuance of a specialty license plate described by Subsection (a) is the amount established under Section 504.851.

(c) Notwithstanding any other law, from each fee received for the issuance of a specialty license plate described by Subsection (a), the department shall:

(1) deduct the administrative costs described by Section 504.601(a)(2);

(2) deposit to the credit of the account designated by the law authorizing the specialty license plate the portion of the fee for the sale of the plate that the state would ordinarily receive under the contract described by Section 504.851(a); and

(3) pay to the private vendor the remainder of the fee.

(d) A sponsor of a specialty license plate authorized to be issued under this subchapter before November 19, 2009, may reestablish its specialty license plate under Sections 504.601 and 504.702 and be credited its previous deposit with the department if a contract entered into by the sponsor under Subsection (a) terminates.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1381 (S.B. 1616), Sec. 5, eff. September 1, 2009.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1296 (H.B. 2357), Sec. 203, eff. January 1, 2012.

Sec. 504.6012. ELIMINATION OF DEDICATED REVENUE ACCOUNTS; REVENUES IN TRUST. (a) Notwithstanding any other law, not later than September 30, 2023, the comptroller shall eliminate all dedicated accounts established for specialty license plates and shall set aside the balances of those dedicated accounts so that the balances may be appropriated only for the purposes intended as provided by the dedications.

(b) On and after September 1, 2023, the portion of a fee payable that is designated for deposit to a dedicated account shall be paid instead to the credit of an account in a trust fund created by the comptroller outside the general revenue fund. The comptroller shall administer the trust fund and accounts and may allocate the corpus and earnings on each account only in accordance with the dedications of the revenue deposited to the trust fund accounts.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1173 (H.B. 3317), Sec. 15, eff. September 1, 2019.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 829 (H.B. 2896), Sec. 14, eff. September 1, 2021.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 858 (H.B. 3461), Sec. 17, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 504.602. KEEP TEXAS BEAUTIFUL LICENSE PLATES. (a) The department shall issue specialty license plates including the words "Keep Texas Beautiful." The department shall design the license plates in consultation with Keep Texas Beautiful, Inc.

(b) After deduction of the department's administrative costs, the remainder of the fee for issuance of the license plates shall be used in connection with the department's litter prevention and community beautification programs.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1320, Sec. 6, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 504.603. TEXAS CAPITOL LICENSE PLATES. (a) The department shall design and issue specialty license plates relating to the State Capitol. The department may design the license plates in consultation with the State Preservation Board.

(b) After deduction of the department's administrative costs, the remainder of the fee for issuance of the license plates shall be deposited to the credit of the Capitol fund established under Section 443.0101, Government Code.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1320, Sec. 6, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1251 (S.B. 1914), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 504.604. TEXAS COMMISSION ON THE ARTS LICENSE PLATES. (a) The department shall issue specialty license plates including the words "State of the Arts." The department shall design the license plates in consultation with the Texas Commission on the Arts.

(b) After deduction of the department's administrative costs, the remainder of the fee for issuance of the license plates shall be deposited to the credit of the Texas Commission on the Arts operating fund established under Section 444.027, Government Code.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1320, Sec. 6, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 504.605. ANIMAL FRIENDLY LICENSE PLATES. (a) The department shall issue specialty license plates including the words "Animal Friendly." The department shall design the license plates.

(b) After deduction of the department's administrative costs, the remainder of the fee for issuance of the license plates shall be deposited to the credit of the animal friendly account established by Section 828.014, Health and Safety Code.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1320, Sec. 6, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 504.606. BIG BEND NATIONAL PARK LICENSE PLATES. (a) The department shall issue specialty license plates that include one or more graphic images of a significant feature of Big Bend National Park. The department shall design the license plates in consultation with the Parks and Wildlife Department and any organization designated by it.

(b) After deduction of the department's administrative costs, the remainder of the fee for issuance of the license plates shall be deposited to the credit of the Big Bend National Park account in the state treasury. Money in the account may be used only by the Parks and Wildlife Department to support the activities of a designated nonprofit organization whose primary purpose is the improvement or preservation of Big Bend National Park.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1320, Sec. 6, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 504.607. READ TO SUCCEED. (a) The department shall issue specialty license plates including the words "Read to Succeed." The department shall design the license plates.

(b) After deduction of the department's administrative costs, the remainder of the fee shall be deposited to the credit of the "Read to Succeed" account in the general revenue fund. Money in the account may be used only to provide educational materials for public school libraries. The account is composed of:

(1) money required to be deposited to the credit of the account under this subsection; and

(2) donations made to the account.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1320, Sec. 6, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 504.608. MOTHERS AGAINST DRUNK DRIVING LICENSE PLATES. (a) The department shall issue specialty license plates that include the words "Mothers Against Drunk Driving." The department shall design the license plates in consultation with Mothers Against Drunk Driving.

(b) After deduction of the department's administrative costs, the remainder of the fee for issuance of the license plates shall be deposited to the credit of the general revenue fund and may be appropriated only to the Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board in making grants to benefit drug-abuse prevention and education programs sponsored by Mothers Against Drunk Driving.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1320, Sec. 6, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 575 (H.B. 1480), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2005.

Sec. 504.609. UNITED STATES OLYMPIC COMMITTEE LICENSE PLATES. The department shall issue specialty license plates including the words "United States Olympic Committee." The department shall design the license plates in consultation with the United States Olympic Committee.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1320, Sec. 6, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 504.610. TEXAS AEROSPACE COMMISSION LICENSE PLATES. (a) The department may issue specialty license plates in recognition of the Texas Aerospace Commission. The department shall design the license plates in consultation with the Texas Aerospace Commission.

(b) After deduction of the department's administrative costs, the remainder of the fee for issuance of the license plates shall be deposited to the credit of the general revenue fund.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1320, Sec. 6, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1135 (H.B. 2741), Sec. 79, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 504.611. VOLUNTEER ADVOCATE PROGRAM LICENSE PLATES. (a) The department shall issue specialty license plates in recognition of children. The department shall design the license plates in consultation with the Health and Human Services Commission.

(b) After deduction of the department's administrative costs, the remainder of the fee for issuance of the license plates shall be deposited to the credit of the volunteer advocate program account in the general revenue fund. Money deposited to the credit of the volunteer advocate program account may be used only by the Health and Human Services Commission to fund a contract entered into by the commission under Section 264.602, Family Code.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1320, Sec. 6, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 597 (S.B. 354), Sec. 15, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 504.612. TEXAS YOUNG LAWYERS ASSOCIATION LICENSE PLATES. (a) The department shall issue specialty license plates including the words "And Justice for All." The department shall design the license plates in consultation with the Texas Young Lawyers Association.

(b) After deduction of the department's administrative costs, the remainder of the fee for issuance of the license plates shall be deposited to the credit of the basic civil legal services account established by Section 51.943, Government Code.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1320, Sec. 6, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 504.613. HOUSTON LIVESTOCK SHOW AND RODEO LICENSE PLATES. (a) The department shall issue specialty license plates including the words "Houston Livestock Show and Rodeo." The department shall design the license plates in consultation with the Houston Livestock Show and Rodeo.

(b) After deduction of the department's administrative costs, the remainder of the fee for issuance of the license plates shall be deposited to the credit of the Houston Livestock Show and Rodeo scholarship account in the state treasury. Money in the account may be used only by the Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board in making grants to benefit the Houston Livestock Show and Rodeo.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1320, Sec. 6, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 504.614. PROFESSIONAL SPORTS TEAM LICENSE PLATES. (a) The department may issue specialty license plates that include the name and insignia of a professional sports team located in this state. The department shall design the license plates in consultation with the professional sports team and may enter a trademark license with the professional sports team or its league to implement this section. A license plate may be issued under this section only for a professional sports team that:

(1) certifies to the department that the requirements of Section 504.702 are met; and

(2) plays its home games in a facility:

(A) constructed or operated, in whole or in part, with public funds; or

(B) owned, in whole or in part, by a public entity.

(b) After deduction of the department's administrative costs, the remainder of the fee for issuance of the license plates shall be sent to the public entity that provided public funds for the construction or renovation of the facility in which the professional sports team plays its home games or that provides public funds for the operation of that facility. The funds shall be deposited to the credit of the venue project fund, if the public entity has created a venue project fund under Section 334.042 or 335.072, Local Government Code. If the public entity has not created a venue project fund, funds distributed to a public entity under this section must first be used to retire any public debt incurred by the public entity in the construction or acquisition of the facility in which the professional sports team plays its home games. After that debt is retired, funds distributed to the public entity may be spent only for maintenance or improvement of the facility.

(b-1) A public entity that receives money under Subsection (b) may contract with the private vendor under Section 504.6011 to distribute the entity's portion of the money in a manner other than that described by Subsection (b).

(c) In this section:

(1) "Public entity" includes a municipality, county, industrial development corporation, or special district that is authorized to plan, acquire, establish, develop, construct, or renovate a facility in which a professional sports team plays its home games.

(2) "Professional sports team" means a sports team that is a member or an affiliate of a member of the National Football League, National Basketball Association, National Hockey League, Major League Soccer, or a major league baseball team.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1320, Sec. 6, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1296 (H.B. 2357), Sec. 204, eff. January 1, 2012.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 423 (H.B. 1778), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2023.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 423 (H.B. 1778), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 504.615. COLLEGIATE LICENSE PLATES. (a) The department shall issue specialty license plates that include the name and insignia of a college. The department shall design the license plates in consultation with the applicable college. The department may issue a license plate under this section only for a college that certifies to the department that the requirements of Section 504.702 are met.

(b) After deduction of the department's administrative costs, the remainder of the fee for issuance of the license plates shall be deposited to the credit of the general revenue fund. The money may be used only for:

(1) scholarships to students who demonstrate a need for financial assistance under Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board rule; or

(2) Texas Public Educational Grants awarded under Subchapter C, Chapter 56, Education Code, if the fee is for the issuance of a license plate for a college described by Subsection (e)(1).

(c) If the fee is for the issuance of license plates for a college described by Subsection (e)(1), the money:

(1) shall be deposited to the credit of the institution of higher education designated on the license plates; and

(2) is supplementary and is not income for purposes of reducing general revenue appropriations to that institution of higher education.

(d) If the fee is for the issuance of license plates for a college described by Subsection (e)(2), the money shall be deposited to the credit of the Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board. The money:

(1) shall be allocated to students at the college designated on the plates; and

(2) is in addition to other money that the board may allocate to that college.

(d-1) If the fee is for the issuance of license plates for a college described by Subsection (e)(3), the money:

(1) shall be deposited to the credit of the Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board; and

(2) is supplementary and is not income for purposes of reducing general revenue appropriations to that board.

(e) In this section, "college" means:

(1) an institution of higher education as defined by Section 61.003, Education Code;

(2) a private college or university described by Section 61.222, Education Code; or

(3) a college or university that is not located in this state.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1320, Sec. 6, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1181 (S.B. 1227), Sec. 53, eff. September 1, 2005.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1296 (H.B. 2357), Sec. 205, eff. January 1, 2012.

Sec. 504.616. TEXAS READS LICENSE PLATES. (a) The department shall issue specialty license plates including the words "Texas Reads" that incorporate one or more submissions from middle school students in a competition conducted by the department.

(b) After deduction of the department's administrative costs, the remainder of the fee shall be deposited to the credit of the Texas Reads account in the general revenue fund. Money from the account may be used only to make grants under Section 441.0092, Government Code. The account is composed of:

(1) money required to be deposited to the credit of the account under this subsection; and

(2) donations made to the account.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1320, Sec. 6, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1296 (H.B. 2357), Sec. 206, eff. January 1, 2012.

Sec. 504.617. TEXAS. IT'S LIKE A WHOLE OTHER COUNTRY LICENSE PLATES. (a) The department shall issue specialty license plates that include the trademarked Texas patch and the words "Texas. It's Like A Whole Other Country." The department shall design the license plates in consultation with the Texas Department of Economic Development.

(b) After deduction of the department's administrative costs, the remainder of the fee for issuance of the license plates shall be deposited to the credit of the tourism account in the general revenue fund to finance the Texas Department of Economic Development's tourism activities.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1320, Sec. 6, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 504.618. CONSERVATION LICENSE PLATES. (a) The department shall issue specialty license plates to support Parks and Wildlife Department activities. The department shall design the license plates in consultation with the Parks and Wildlife Department.

(b) After deduction of the department's administrative costs, the remainder of the fee for issuance of the license plates shall be deposited to the credit of the Texas parks and wildlife conservation and capital account established by Section 11.043, Parks and Wildlife Code. Money deposited in the Texas parks and wildlife conservation and capital account under this section is supplementary and is not income for the purposes of reducing general revenue appropriations to the Parks and Wildlife Department.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1320, Sec. 6, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 504.619. TEXAS COMMISSION FOR THE DEAF AND HARD OF HEARING LICENSE PLATES. (a) The department shall issue specialty license plates in support of the Texas Commission for the Deaf and Hard of Hearing. The department shall design the license plates in consultation with the Texas Commission for the Deaf and Hard of Hearing.

(b) After deduction of the department's administrative costs, the remainder of the fee for issuance of the license plates:

(1) shall be deposited to the credit of the general revenue fund; and

(2) may be appropriated only to the Texas Commission for the Deaf and Hard of Hearing for direct services programs, training, and education.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1320, Sec. 6, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 504.620. TEXANS CONQUER CANCER LICENSE PLATES. (a) The department shall issue specialty license plates that include the words "Texans Conquer Cancer." The department shall design the license plates in consultation with the Cancer Prevention and Research Institute of Texas.

(b) After deduction of the department's administrative costs, the remainder of the fee for issuance of the license plates shall be deposited to the credit of the cancer prevention and research fund established by Section 102.201, Health and Safety Code.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 266 (H.B. 14), Sec. 6, eff. November 6, 2007.

Sec. 504.6201. CANCER OF UNKNOWN PRIMARY ORIGIN AWARENESS LICENSE PLATES. (a) The department shall issue specialty license plates to raise awareness of cancer of unknown primary origin. The license plates must include the words "A Fine Cause for Unknown Cancer." The department shall design the license plates in consultation with the Orange Grove Family Career and Community Leaders of America.

(b) After deduction of the department's administrative costs, the remainder of the fee for issuance of the license plates shall be deposited to the credit of the cancer prevention and research fund established by Section 102.201, Health and Safety Code.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1005 (H.B. 4064), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2009.

Sec. 504.621. SPECIAL OLYMPICS TEXAS LICENSE PLATES. (a) The department shall issue specialty license plates that include the words "Special Olympics Texas." The department shall design the license plates in consultation with Special Olympics Texas.

(b) After deduction of the department's administrative costs, the remainder of the fee for issuance of the license plates shall be deposited to the credit of the Special Olympics Texas account established by Section 533.018, Health and Safety Code.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1320, Sec. 6, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 504.622. GIRL SCOUT LICENSE PLATES. (a) The department shall issue specialty license plates that include the words "Girl Scouts." The department shall design the license plates in consultation with the Girl Scout Councils of Texas.

(b) After deduction of the department's administrative costs, the remainder of the fee for issuance of the license plates shall be deposited to the credit of the Girl Scout account in the state treasury. Money in the account may be used by the Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board in making grants to benefit educational projects sponsored by the Girl Scout Councils of Texas.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1320, Sec. 6, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 504.623. TEXAS YMCA. (a) The department shall issue specialty license plates in honor of the Young Men's Christian Association. The department shall design the license plates.

(b) After deduction of the department's administrative costs, the remainder of the fee for issuance of the license plates shall be deposited to the credit of the YMCA account established by Section 7.025, Education Code, as added by Chapter 869, Acts of the 77th Legislature, Regular Session, 2001.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1320, Sec. 6, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 504.625. TEXAS AGRICULTURAL PRODUCTS LICENSE PLATES. (a) The department shall issue specialty license plates that include the words "Go Texan" and the "Go Texan" logo of the Department of Agriculture. The department shall design the license plates in consultation with the commissioner of agriculture.

(b) After deduction of the department's administrative costs, the department shall deposit the remainder of the proceeds to the credit of the "Go Texan" partner program account established by Section 46.008, Agriculture Code.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1320, Sec. 6, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 504.626. TEXAS CITRUS INDUSTRY. (a) The department shall issue specialty license plates in honor of the citrus industry in this state. The department shall design the license plates.

(b) After deduction of the department's administrative costs, the remainder of the fee for issuance of the license plates shall be deposited to the credit of an account in the general revenue fund that may be appropriated only to Texas A&M University--Kingsville to provide financial assistance to graduate students in the College of Agriculture and Human Sciences.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1320, Sec. 6, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 504.627. WATERFOWL AND WETLAND CONSERVATION LICENSE PLATES. (a) The department shall issue specialty license plates including one or more graphic images supplied by the Parks and Wildlife Department. The department shall design the license plates in consultation with the Parks and Wildlife Department and any organization designated by it.

(b) After deducting the department's administrative costs, the remainder of the fee for issuance of the license plates shall be deposited to the credit of an account in the state treasury. Money in the account may be used only by the Parks and Wildlife Department to support the activities of a designated nonprofit organization whose primary purpose is the conservation of waterfowl and wetland.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1320, Sec. 6, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 504.6275. SAVE OUR BEACHES LICENSE PLATES. (a) The department shall issue specialty license plates to support the coastal protection and improvement program.

(b) After deduction of the department's administrative costs, the remainder of the fee for issuance of the license plates shall be deposited to the credit of the coastal protection and improvement fund established by Section 33.653, Natural Resources Code, to fund the cleaning, maintaining, nourishing, and protecting of state beaches.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 625 (H.B. 1286), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2009.

Sec. 504.628. UNITED WE STAND LICENSE PLATES. (a) The department shall issue specialty license plates that include the words "United We Stand" and include only the colors red, white, blue, and black.

(b) After deduction of the department's administrative costs, the remainder of the fee for issuance of the license plates shall be deposited to the credit of the Texas mobility fund.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1320, Sec. 6, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 504.630. AIR FORCE ASSOCIATION LICENSE PLATES. (a) The department shall issue specialty license plates that include the words "Air Force Association." The department shall design the license plates in consultation with the Air Force Association of Texas.

(b) After deduction of the department's administrative costs, the remainder of the fee shall be deposited to the credit of the Air Force Association of Texas account in the state treasury. Money in the account may be used by the Texas Veterans Commission in making grants to benefit projects sponsored by the Air Force Association of Texas.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1320, Sec. 6, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 504.631. TEXAS STATE RIFLE ASSOCIATION LICENSE PLATES. (a) The department shall issue specialty license plates to honor the Texas State Rifle Association.

(b) After deduction of the department's administrative costs, the remainder of the fee shall be deposited to the credit of an account in the general revenue fund that may be appropriated only to the Texas Cooperative Extension of The Texas A&M University System as follows:

(1) 50 percent to supplement existing and future scholarship programs supported by the Texas State Rifle Association; and

(2) 50 percent to support the 4-H Shooting Sports Program for youth.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1320, Sec. 6, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 311 (H.B. 2045), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 504.632. URBAN FORESTRY LICENSE PLATES. (a) The department shall issue specialty license plates to benefit urban forestry. The department shall design the license plates in consultation with an organization described in Subsection (b).

(b) After deduction of the department's administrative costs, the remainder of the fee shall be deposited to the credit of the urban forestry account in the state treasury. Money in the account may be used by the Texas Forest Service in making grants to support the activities of a nonprofit organization located in Texas whose primary purpose is to sponsor projects involving urban and community:

(1) tree planting;

(2) tree preservation; and

(3) tree education programs.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1320, Sec. 6, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 504.633. SHARE THE ROAD LICENSE PLATES. (a) The department shall issue specialty license plates that include the words "Share the Road" and the image of a bicycle or a bicycle with a rider. The department shall design the plates in consultation with the Texas Bicycle Coalition Education Fund.

(b) After deduction of the department's administrative costs, the remainder of the fee shall be deposited to the credit of the share the road account in the state treasury to be used only by the Texas Education Agency to support the activities of a designated nonprofit organization whose primary purpose is to promote bicyclist safety, education, and access through:

(1) education and awareness programs; and

(2) training, workshops, educational materials, and media events.

(c) Up to 25 percent of the amount in Subsection (b) may be used to support the activities of the nonprofit organization in marketing and promoting the share the road concept and license plates.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1320, Sec. 6, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 504.635. EL PASO MISSION VALLEY LICENSE PLATES. (a) The department shall issue El Paso Mission Valley specialty license plates. The department shall design the license plates in consultation with the Socorro Mission Restoration Effort.

(b) After deduction of the department's administrative costs, the remainder of the fee shall be deposited to the credit of the El Paso Mission Restoration account in the state treasury. Money in the account may be used only by the Texas Historical Commission in making grants to be used for the purpose of the preservation and rehabilitation of the Socorro, San Elizario, and Ysleta Missions.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1320, Sec. 6, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 301 (H.B. 1347), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 504.636. COTTON BOLL LICENSE PLATES. (a) The department shall issue specialty license plates depicting a graphic image of a cotton boll. The department shall design the license plates in consultation with Texas Cotton Producers, Inc.

(b) After deduction of the department's administrative costs, the remainder of the fee shall be deposited to the credit of the general revenue fund for use only by the Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board in making grants to benefit Texas Cotton Producers, Inc., for the sole purpose of providing scholarships to students who are pursuing a degree in an agricultural field related to the cotton industry while enrolled in an institution of higher education, as defined by Section 61.003, Education Code.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1320, Sec. 6, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 504.637. DAUGHTERS OF THE REPUBLIC OF TEXAS LICENSE PLATES. (a) The department shall issue specialty license plates that include the words "Native Texan." The department shall design the license plates in consultation with the Daughters of the Republic of Texas.

(b) After deduction of the department's administrative costs, the remainder of the fee shall be deposited to the credit of the Daughters of the Republic of Texas account in the state treasury. Money in the account may be used only by the Texas Department of Economic Development or its successor agency in making grants to the Daughters of the Republic of Texas to be used only for the purpose of:

(1) preserving Texas historic sites; or

(2) funding educational programs that teach Texas history.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1320, Sec. 6, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 504.638. KNIGHTS OF COLUMBUS LICENSE PLATES. (a) The department shall issue specialty license plates that include the words "Knights of Columbus" and the emblem of the Order of the Knights of Columbus. The department shall design the license plates in consultation with the Knights of Columbus.

(b) After deduction of the department's administrative costs, the remainder of the fee for issuance of the license plates shall be deposited to the credit of the State Council Charities account in the general revenue fund. Money in the account may be used only by the Texas Education Agency to make grants to State Council Charities to carry out the purposes of that organization.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1320, Sec. 6, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 504.639. TEXAS MUSIC LICENSE PLATES. (a) The department shall issue specialty license plates that include the words "Texas Music." The department shall design the license plates in consultation with the governor's office.

(b) After deduction of the department's administrative costs, the remainder of the fee for issuance of the license plates shall be deposited to the credit of the Texas Music Foundation account established by Section 7.027, Education Code.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1320, Sec. 6, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 504.640. SPACE SHUTTLE COLUMBIA LICENSE PLATES. (a) The department shall issue Space Shuttle Columbia specialty license plates. The department shall design the license plates in consultation with the Aviation and Space Foundation of Texas.

(b) After deduction of the department's administrative costs, the remainder of the fee for issuance of the license plates shall be deposited to the credit of the general revenue fund and may be used only by the Texas Aerospace Commission or its successor agency in making grants to benefit the Aviation and Space Foundation of Texas for the purposes of furthering aviation and space activities in Texas and providing Columbia Crew memorial scholarships to students.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1320, Sec. 6, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 504.641. BE A BLOOD DONOR LICENSE PLATES. (a) The department shall issue Be a Blood Donor specialty license plates. The department shall design the license plates in consultation with the Gulf Coast Regional Blood Center in Houston.

(b) After deduction of the department's administrative costs, the remainder of the fee for issuance of the license plates shall be deposited to the credit of the be a blood donor account under Section 162.016, Health and Safety Code.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1320, Sec. 6, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 504.642. TEXAS COUNCIL OF CHILD WELFARE BOARDS LICENSE PLATES. (a) The department shall issue Texas Council of Child Welfare Boards specialty license plates. The department shall design the license plates in consultation with the Texas Council of Child Welfare Boards, Inc.

(b) After deduction of the department's administrative costs, the remainder of the fee for issuance of the license plates shall be deposited to the credit of a special account for abused and neglected children established at the Department of Protective and Regulatory Services. Money in the account may be used only by the Department of Protective and Regulatory Services to fund programs and services supporting abused and neglected children under Section 264.004, Family Code.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1320, Sec. 6, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1296 (H.B. 2357), Sec. 207, eff. January 1, 2012.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1296 (H.B. 2357), Sec. 208, eff. January 1, 2012.

Sec. 504.644. MARINE MAMMAL RECOVERY LICENSE PLATES. (a) The department shall issue Marine Mammal Recovery specialty license plates. The department shall design the license plates in consultation with the Parks and Wildlife Department and the Texas Marine Mammal Stranding Network.

(b) After deduction of the department's administrative costs, the remainder of the fee for issuance of the license plates shall be deposited to the credit of an account in the state treasury. Money in the account may be used only by the Parks and Wildlife Department to support the activities of the Texas Marine Mammal Stranding Network in the recovery, rehabilitation, and release of stranded marine mammals. The Parks and Wildlife Department shall establish reporting and other mechanisms necessary to ensure that the money is spent for purposes for which it is dedicated.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1320, Sec. 6, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 504.645. 4-H LICENSE PLATES. (a) The department shall issue specialty license plates that include the words "To Make the Best Better," the words "Texas 4-H," and the 4-H symbol of the four-leaf clover. The department shall design the license plates in consultation with the Texas 4-H and Youth Development Program.

(b) After deduction of the department's administrative costs, the remainder of the fee for issuance of the license plates shall be deposited to the credit of the general revenue fund and shall be used only by the Texas Cooperative Extension of the Texas A&M University System for 4-H and Youth Development Programs and to support the Texas Cooperative Extension's activities related to 4-H and Youth Development Programs.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1320, Sec. 6, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 504.646. SMILE TEXAS STYLE LICENSE PLATES. (a) The department shall issue specialty license plates that include the words "Smile Texas Style." The department shall design the license plates in consultation with the Texas Dental Association.

(b) After deduction of the department's administrative costs, the remainder of the fee for issuance of the license plates shall be deposited to the credit of the general revenue fund to be used only by the Texas Department of Health in making grants to benefit the Texas Dental Association Financial Services for the sole use of providing charitable dental care.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1320, Sec. 6, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 504.647. FIGHT TERRORISM LICENSE PLATES. (a) The department shall issue Fight Terrorism specialty license plates that include a pentagon-shaped border surrounding:

(1) the date "9-11-01" with the likeness of the World Trade Center towers forming the "11";

(2) the likeness of the United States flag; and

(3) the words "Fight Terrorism."

(b) The fee shall be deposited to the credit of the Texas Department of Motor Vehicles fund.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1320, Sec. 6, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1296 (H.B. 2357), Sec. 209, eff. January 1, 2012.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1287 (H.B. 2202), Sec. 38, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 504.648. GOD BLESS TEXAS AND GOD BLESS AMERICA LICENSE PLATES. (a) The department shall issue specialty license plates that include the words "God Bless Texas" and "God Bless America."

(b) After deduction of the department's administrative costs, the remainder of the fee shall be deposited to the credit of the share the road account in the state treasury and may only be used by the Texas Education Agency to support the Safe Routes to School Program of a designated statewide nonprofit organization whose primary purpose is to promote bicyclist safety, education, and access through:

(1) education and awareness programs; and

(2) training, workshops, educational materials, and media events.

(c) The fee for the license plates is $40.

(d) Up to 25 percent of the amount in Subsection (b) may be used to support the activities of the nonprofit organization in marketing and promoting the Safe Routes to School Program and the God Bless Texas and God Bless America license plates.

(e) The Texas Education Agency may use money received under this section to secure funds available under federal matching programs for safe routes to school and obesity prevention.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1320, Sec. 6, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 201 (S.B. 161), Sec. 1, eff. May 27, 2009.

Sec. 504.649. TEXAS JUNETEENTH LICENSE PLATES. (a) The department shall issue Texas Juneteenth specialty license plates. The department shall design the license plates in consultation with Unity Unlimited Inc.

(b) After deduction of the department's administrative costs, the remainder of the fee for issuance of the license plates shall be deposited to the credit of the general revenue fund to be used only by the Texas Historical Commission in making grants to Unity Unlimited Inc. for the purpose of promoting the celebration of Juneteenth in this state, provided that verification is submitted to the Texas Historical Commission demonstrating that Unity Unlimited Inc. continues to maintain its nonprofit status. If Unity Unlimited Inc. does not have nonprofit status at the time of the distribution of a grant, the grant shall be distributed to another nonprofit organization for the purpose of promoting the celebration of Juneteenth in this state.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 968 (H.B. 3610), Sec. 1, eff. January 1, 2016.

Sec. 504.651. MARCH OF DIMES LICENSE PLATES. (a) The department shall issue specialty license plates that include the words "March of Dimes." The department shall design the license plates in consultation with the March of Dimes Texas Chapter.

(b) After deduction of the department's administrative costs, the remainder of the fee for issuance of the license plates shall be deposited to the credit of the Texas Department of Health for use in the Birth Defects Registry.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1320, Sec. 6, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 504.652. MASTER GARDENER LICENSE PLATES. (a) The department shall issue specialty license plates that include the seal of the Texas Master Gardener program of Texas Cooperative Extension.

(b) After deduction of the department's administrative costs, the remainder of the fee for issuance of the license plates shall be deposited to the credit of an account in the general revenue fund. Money in the account may be used only by Texas A&M AgriLife Extension for graduate student assistantships within the Texas Master Gardener program and to support Texas A&M AgriLife Extension's activities related to the Texas Master Gardener program.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1320, Sec. 6, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1135 (H.B. 2741), Sec. 80, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 504.654. EAGLE SCOUT LICENSE PLATES. (a) The department shall issue specialty license plates that bear a depiction of the Eagle Scout medal.

(b) After deduction of the department's administrative costs, the remainder of the fee for issuance of the license plates shall be deposited to the credit of the Eagle Scout account in the general revenue fund. Money in the account may be used only by the Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board in making grants to support projects sponsored by Boy Scout councils in this state. The Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board shall distribute grants under this section geographically as nearly as possible in proportion to the number of license plates issued under this section in each region of the state.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1320, Sec. 6, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 504.6545. BOY SCOUT LICENSE PLATES. (a) The department shall issue specialty license plates that include the words "Boy Scouts of America." The department shall design the license plates in consultation with the Boy Scouts of America.

(b) After deduction of the department's administrative costs, the remainder of the fee for issuance of the license plates shall be deposited to the credit of the Boy Scout account in the general revenue fund. Money in the account may be used only by the Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board in making grants to benefit educational projects sponsored by Boy Scout councils in this state.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 575 (H.B. 1480), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2005.

Sec. 504.655. CHILDHOOD CANCER AWARENESS PLATES. (a) The department shall issue specialty license plates to raise awareness of childhood cancer. The department shall design the license plates in consultation with an organization that seeks to raise awareness of childhood cancer in this state.

(b) After deduction of the department's administrative costs, the remainder of the fee for issuance of the license plates shall be deposited to the credit of an account created by the comptroller in the manner provided by Section 504.6012(b). Money deposited to that account may be used by the General Land Office only to provide grants to benefit organizations operating in this state that raise awareness of, conduct research on, or provide services for persons diagnosed with childhood cancer.

(c) The General Land Office and an organization that receives a grant under Subsection (b) may enter into a memorandum of understanding establishing the respective duties of the General Land Office and the organization in relation to carrying out the purposes of that subsection.

(d) Section 504.702 does not apply to a specialty license plate issued under this section.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 865 (H.B. 2700), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 504.6551. PEDIATRIC CANCER RESEARCH LICENSE PLATES. (a) The department shall issue specialty license plates that include the words "Kids Shouldn't Have Cancer." The department shall design the plates in consultation with the Kids Shouldn't Have Cancer Foundation.

(b) After deduction of the department's administrative costs, the remainder of the fee for issuance of the license plates shall be deposited to the credit of the cancer prevention and research fund established by Section 102.201, Health and Safety Code. Money deposited to that account may be used only to fund pediatric cancer research.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 670 (S.B. 2015), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 504.656. TEXAS LIONS CAMP LICENSE PLATES. (a) The department shall issue Texas Lions Camp specialty license plates. The department shall design the license plates in consultation with the Texas Lions League for Crippled Children.

(b) After deduction of the department's administrative costs, the remainder of the fee for issuance of the license plates shall be deposited to the credit of the Texas Lions Camp account in the state treasury. Money in the account may be used only by the Parks and Wildlife Department to support the activities of a designated nonprofit organization that is accredited by the American Camping Association and is licensed by the Texas Department of Health and whose primary purpose is to provide, without charge, a camp for physically disabled, hearing or vision impaired, and diabetic children who reside in this state, regardless of race, religion, or national origin. The Parks and Wildlife Department shall establish reporting and other mechanisms necessary to ensure that the money is spent only for the purposes for which it is dedicated.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1320, Sec. 6, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 504.657. HIGHER EDUCATION COORDINATING BOARD LICENSE PLATES. (a) The department shall issue specialty license plates for the Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board. The department shall design the license plates in consultation with the coordinating board.

(b) After deduction of the department's administrative costs, the remainder of the fee shall be deposited to the credit of the "College For Texans" campaign account in the general revenue fund for use only by the Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board for purposes of the campaign.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1181 (S.B. 1227), Sec. 54, eff. September 1, 2005.

Sec. 504.658. INSURE TEXAS KIDS LICENSE PLATES. (a) The department shall issue specialty license plates that include the words "Insure Texas Kids."

(b) After deduction of the department's administrative costs, the remainder of the fee for issuance of the license plates shall be deposited to the credit of the general revenue fund and may be appropriated only to the Health and Human Services Commission to fund outreach efforts for public and private health benefit plans available for children.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1313 (S.B. 1032), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 504.659. MEMBERS OF AMERICAN LEGION. (a) The department shall issue specialty license plates for members of the American Legion. The license plates shall include the words "Still Serving America" and the emblem of the American Legion. The department shall design the license plates in consultation with the American Legion.

(b) The fee for the license plates is $30.

(c) After deduction of $8 to reimburse the department for its administrative costs, the remainder of the fee for issuance of the license plates shall be deposited to the credit of the American Legion, Department of Texas account in the state treasury. Money in the account may be used only by the Texas Veterans Commission in making grants to the American Legion Endowment Fund for scholarships and youth programs sponsored by the American Legion, Department of Texas.

Transferred and redesignated from Transportation Code, Section 504.413 by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1296 (H.B. 2357), Sec. 210, eff. January 1, 2012.

Sec. 504.660. SEXUAL ASSAULT AWARENESS LICENSE PLATES. (a) The department shall design and issue specialty license plates to support victims of sexual assault.

(b) Repealed by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1135, Sec. 140(3), eff. September 1, 2013.

(c) After deduction of the department's administrative costs, the remainder of the fee for issuance of the license plates shall be deposited to the credit of the sexual assault program fund established by Section 420.008, Government Code.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1381 (S.B. 1616), Sec. 6, eff. September 1, 2009.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1135 (H.B. 2741), Sec. 140(3), eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 504.661. MARINE CONSERVATION LICENSE PLATES. (a) After deduction of the department's administrative costs in accordance with Section 504.801, the remainder of the fees allocated under Section 504.801(e)(2)(A) from the sale of Marine Conservation plates shall be deposited to the credit of an account in the state treasury to be used by the Texas Parks and Wildlife Department to support the activities of Coastal Conservation Association Texas in the conservation of marine resources.

(b) The Texas Parks and Wildlife Department shall establish reporting and other mechanisms necessary to ensure that the money is spent for the purpose for which it is dedicated.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 397 (H.B. 1749), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2009.

Redesignated from Transportation Code, Section 504.660 by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 161 (S.B. 1093), Sec. 22.001(53), eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 504.662. SUPPORT ADOPTION LICENSE PLATES. (a) The department shall issue specially designed license plates that include the words "Support Adoption." The department shall design the license plates in consultation with the attorney general.

(b) After deduction of the department's administrative costs, the department shall deposit the remainder of the fee for issuance of license plates under this section in the state treasury to the credit of the Support Adoption account established by Section 402.036, Government Code.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 63 (S.B. 257), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2011.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 977 (S.B. 2376), Sec. 5, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 504.663. BIG BROTHERS BIG SISTERS LICENSE PLATES. (a) The department shall issue specialty license plates in recognition of the mentoring efforts of Big Brothers Big Sisters of America organizations operating in this state. The department shall design the license plates in consultation with a representative from a Big Brothers Big Sisters of America organization operating in this state and the attorney general.

(b) After deduction of the department's administrative costs, the remainder of the fee for issuance of the license plates shall be deposited to the credit of the Specialty License Plates General Account in the general revenue fund. Money deposited to the credit of the Specialty License Plates General Account under this section may be used only by the attorney general to provide grants to benefit Big Brothers Big Sisters of America organizations operating in this state.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1135 (H.B. 2741), Sec. 81, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 504.664. FOUNDATION SCHOOL PROGRAM LICENSE PLATES. (a) The department shall issue specially designed license plates to benefit the Foundation School Program. The department shall design the license plates in consultation with the Texas Education Agency.

(b) After deduction of the department's administrative costs, the department shall deposit the remainder of the fee for issuance of license plates under this section to the credit of the foundation school fund.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1102 (H.B. 3677), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2013.

Redesignated from Transportation Code, Section 504.663 by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1236 (S.B. 1296), Sec. 21.001(56), eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 504.665. ALAMO LICENSE PLATES. (a) The department shall issue specialty license plates that include the image of the Alamo and the word "Remember" at the bottom of each plate.

(b) After deduction of the department's administrative costs, the remainder of the fee for issuance of the license plates shall be deposited to the credit of an account created by the comptroller in the manner provided by Section 504.6012(b). Money deposited to that account may be used only by the General Land Office as follows:

(1) 75 percent of the money shall be used for the preservation of the Alamo; and

(2) 25 percent of the money shall be used to enhance the Alamo visitor experience or to fund education programs about the Alamo.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 698 (H.B. 830), Sec. 1, eff. January 1, 2016.

Sec. 504.666. K9S4COPS LICENSE PLATES. (a) The department shall issue K9s4COPs specialty license plates. The department shall design the license plates in consultation with K9s4COPs.

(b) After deduction of the department's administrative costs, the remainder of the fee for issuance of the license plates shall be deposited to the credit of the general revenue fund to be used only by the office of the governor in making grants to nonprofit organizations for the purpose of funding the purchase of police dogs by law enforcement agencies.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 942 (H.B. 4099), Sec. 1, eff. January 1, 2016.

Redesignated from Transportation Code, Section 504.649 by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 324 (S.B. 1488), Sec. 24.001(55), eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 504.6661. K9S4KIDS LICENSE PLATES. (a) The department shall issue K9s4KIDs specialty license plates. The department shall design the license plates in consultation with K9s4KIDs.

(b) After deduction of the department's administrative costs, the remainder of the fee for issuance of the license plates shall be deposited to the credit of the general revenue fund to be used only by the Texas Education Agency in making grants to nonprofit organizations for the purpose of funding the purchase of police dogs by a public or private primary or secondary school or by an institution of higher education or private or independent institution of higher education.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 893 (H.B. 5135), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 504.667. TEXAS MEDICAL CENTER LICENSE PLATES. (a) The department shall issue Texas Medical Center specialty license plates. The department shall design the license plates in consultation with Texas Medical Center.

(b) After deduction of the department's administrative costs, the remainder of the fee for issuance of the license plates shall be deposited to the credit of an account created by the comptroller in the manner provided by Section 504.6012(b). Money deposited to that account may be used only by the comptroller to provide grants to benefit Texas Medical Center and member institutions of Texas Medical Center.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 41 (S.B. 742), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2015.

Redesignated from Transportation Code, Section 504.665 by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 324 (S.B. 1488), Sec. 24.001(56), eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 504.668. IN GOD WE TRUST LICENSE PLATES. (a) The department shall issue specially designed license plates that include the words "In God We Trust."

(b) After deduction of the department's administrative costs, the remainder of the fee for issuance of the license plates shall be deposited to the credit of the general revenue fund and may be appropriated only to the Texas Veterans Commission.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 454 (H.B. 315), Sec. 1, eff. January 1, 2016.

Redesignated from Transportation Code, Section 504.665 by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 324 (S.B. 1488), Sec. 24.001(57), eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 504.669. BACK THE BLUE LICENSE PLATES. (a) The department shall issue specialty license plates that include a thin blue line and the words "Back the Blue."

(b) After deduction of the department's administrative costs, the remainder of the fee for issuance of the license plates shall be deposited to the credit of an account created by the comptroller in the manner provided by Section 504.6012(b). Money deposited to that account may be used only by the Employees Retirement System of Texas to provide financial assistance to survivors of peace officers under Chapter 615, Government Code.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 116 (H.B. 263), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2017.

Redesignated from Transportation Code, Section 504.668 by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 467 (H.B. 4170), Sec. 21.001(65), eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 504.670. BLESSED ARE THE PEACEMAKERS LICENSE PLATES. (a) The department shall issue specialty license plates that include the image of the United States flag printed in black and white with a blue stripe crossing beneath the field of stars and the words "Blessed are the Peacemakers" at the bottom of each plate.

(b) After deduction of the department's administrative costs, the remainder of the fee for issuance of the license plates shall be deposited to the credit of an account created by the comptroller in the manner provided by Section 504.6012(b). Money deposited to that account may be used only by the State Preservation Board to maintain the Texas Peace Officers' Memorial Monument under Section 3105.004, Government Code.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1003 (H.B. 1256), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2017.

Redesignated from Transportation Code, Section 504.668 by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 467 (H.B. 4170), Sec. 21.001(66), eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 504.671. F-35 FIGHTER JET LICENSE PLATES. (a) The department shall issue specialty license plates that include the image of an F-35 fighter jet and the words "The Sound of Freedom."

(b) After deduction of the department's administrative costs, the remainder of the fee for issuance of the license plates shall be deposited to the credit of the general revenue fund.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 68 (S.B. 240), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 504.672. REGISTER TO VOTE LICENSE PLATES. (a) The department shall issue specialty license plates that include the words "Register to Vote."

(b) After deduction of the department's administrative costs, the remainder of the fee for issuance of the license plates shall be deposited to the credit of an account created by the comptroller in the manner provided by Section 504.6012(b). Money deposited to that account may be used only by the secretary of state for Project V.O.T.E. or a successor voter education program administered by the office of the secretary of state.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 480 (H.B. 1130), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2019.

Redesignated from Transportation Code, Section 504.671 by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 915 (H.B. 3607), Sec. 21.001(108), eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 504.673. SICKLE CELL DISEASE AWARENESS LICENSE PLATES. (a) The department shall issue specialty license plates that include the words "Sickle Cell Matters" and an image of the burgundy sickle cell ribbon. The department shall design the plates in consultation with the Sickle Cell Association of Houston.

(b) After deduction of the department's administrative costs, the remainder of the fee for issuance of the license plates shall be deposited to the credit of an account created by the comptroller in the manner provided by Section 504.6012(b). Money deposited to that account may be used only by Texas Southern University to make grants to a nonprofit organization that has a history of providing services to persons with sickle cell disease for the purpose of providing those services.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 888 (H.B. 3394), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2019.

Redesignated from Transportation Code, Section 504.671 by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 915 (H.B. 3607), Sec. 21.001(109), eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 504.674. KEEP AUSTIN WEIRD LICENSE PLATES. (a) The department shall issue specialty license plates that include the words "Keep Austin Weird."

(b) After deduction of the department's administrative costs, the remainder of the fee for issuance of the license plates shall be deposited to the credit of the general revenue fund.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 989 (S.B. 1271), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2019.

Redesignated from Transportation Code, Section 504.671 by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 915 (H.B. 3607), Sec. 21.001(110), eff. September 1, 2021.

Text of section as added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 704 (H.B. 2633), Sec. 9

For text of section as added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 286 (H.B. 4080), Sec. 1, see other Sec. 504.675.

For text of section as added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 673 (H.B. 1863), Sec. 1, see other Sec. 504.675.

For text of section as added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 870 (S.B. 1123), Sec. 1, see other Sec. 504.675.

Sec. 504.675. STOP HUMAN TRAFFICKING LICENSE PLATES. (a) The department shall issue specialty license plates to support the trafficked persons program account established under Section 50.0153, Health and Safety Code. The department shall design the license plates in consultation with an organization involved in the support and recovery of human trafficking victims.

(b) After deduction of the department's administrative costs the remainder of the fee for issuance of the license plates shall be deposited to the credit of the trafficked persons program account established under Section 50.0153, Health and Safety Code.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 704 (H.B. 2633), Sec. 9, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 504.676. AUTISM AWARENESS LICENSE PLATES. (a) The department shall issue specialty license plates that include the words "Autism Awareness." The department shall design the plates in consultation with a representative of the Hope for Three nonprofit organization.

(b) After deduction of the department's administrative costs, the remainder of the fee for issuance of the license plates shall be deposited to the credit of an account created by the comptroller in the manner provided by Section 504.6012(b). Money deposited to that account may be used only by the trusteed programs within the office of the governor to make grants to a nonprofit organization whose primary purpose is to create awareness about and provide support to families living with autism spectrum disorder, to be used by that organization for that purpose.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 286 (H.B. 4080), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2021.

Redesignated from Transportation Code, Section 504.675 by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 768 (H.B. 4595), Sec. 24.001(57), eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 504.677. MAKE-A-WISH LICENSE PLATES. (a) The department shall issue specialty license plates that include the words "Make-A-Wish" and an image of the blue Make-A-Wish logo. The department shall design the plates in consultation with the Central and South Texas chapter of Make-A-Wish.

(b) After deduction of the department's administrative costs, the remainder of the fee for issuance of the license plates shall be deposited to the credit of an account created by the comptroller in the manner provided by Section 504.6012(b). Money deposited to that account may be used only by the Health and Human Services Commission to make grants to a nonprofit organization that has a history of providing services to children diagnosed with a critical illness for the purpose of providing those services.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 673 (H.B. 1863), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2021.

Redesignated from Transportation Code, Section 504.675 by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 768 (H.B. 4595), Sec. 24.001(58), eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 504.678. FAMILY FIRST LICENSE PLATES. (a) The department shall issue specialty license plates that include the words "Family First." The department shall design the plates in consultation with a representative of the Family First nonprofit organization.

(b) After deduction of the department's administrative costs, the remainder of the fee for issuance of the license plates shall be deposited to the credit of an account created by the comptroller in the manner provided by Section 504.6012(b). Money deposited to that account may be used only by the Texas Education Agency to make grants to a nonprofit organization with chapters operating in schools in this state whose primary purpose is promoting the importance of fatherhood.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 870 (S.B. 1123), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2021.

Redesignated from Transportation Code, Section 504.675 by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 768 (H.B. 4595), Sec. 24.001(59), eff. September 1, 2023.

Text of section as added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 128 (H.B. 1315), Sec. 3

For text of section as added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 714 (H.B. 2323), Sec. 1, see other Sec. 504.679.

Sec. 504.679. VETERANS EXPOSED TO OPEN BURN PITS. (a) The department shall issue specialty license plates to honor members of the United States armed forces who were exposed to open burn pits during their military service. The license plates must include:

(1) the words "Burn Pits 360 Veterans Organization"; and

(2) a depiction of the Burn Pits 360 nonprofit organization logo.

(b) After deduction of the department's administrative costs, the remainder of the fee for issuance of the license plates shall be deposited to the credit of the open burn pit registry fund established under Section 99.008, Health and Safety Code.

(c) Section 504.702 does not apply to a specialty license plate issued under this section.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 128 (H.B. 1315), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2023.

Text of section as added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 714 (H.B. 2323), Sec. 1

For text of section as added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 128 (H.B. 1315), Sec. 3, see other Sec. 504.679.

Sec. 504.679. TEXAS, OUR TEXAS LICENSE PLATES. (a) The department shall issue specialty license plates designed to commemorate the 100th anniversary of the writing of the state song, "Texas, Our Texas," that include the words "Texas, Our Texas" and the dates "1924-2024."

(b) After deduction of the department's administrative costs, the remainder of the fee for issuance of the license plates shall be deposited to the credit of the general revenue fund.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 714 (H.B. 2323), Sec. 1, eff. January 1, 2024.

Text of section as added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 110 (S.B. 2221), Sec. 1

For text of section as added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 478 (H.B. 628), Sec. 1, see other Sec. 504.680.

Sec. 504.680. SHERIFFS' ASSOCIATION OF TEXAS LICENSE PLATE. (a) The department shall issue specialty license plates to honor the personnel of sheriff's offices. The license plates must include:

(1) the words "Support Your Sheriff's Office"; and

(2) a depiction of the Sheriffs' Association of Texas logo.

(b) After deduction of the department's administrative costs, the remainder of the fee for issuance of the license plates shall be deposited to the credit of an account created by the comptroller in the manner provided by Section 504.6012(b). Money deposited to that account may be used only by the Texas Commission on Law Enforcement to make grants to a nonprofit organization that has a history of promoting the training, retention, and professionalism of sheriff's deputies, county jail employees, emergency service center employees, or other positions and offices administered by a sheriff.

(c) Section 504.702 does not apply to a specialty license plate issued under this section.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 110 (S.B. 2221), Sec. 1, eff. May 19, 2023.

Text of section as added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 478 (H.B. 628), Sec. 1

For text of section as added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 110 (S.B. 2221), Sec. 1, see other Sec. 504.680.

Sec. 504.680. FALLEN LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER LICENSE PLATES. (a) The department shall issue specialty license plates to honor law enforcement officers killed in the line of duty. The license plates must include:

(1) the words "A Hero Remembered Never Dies";

(2) the words "Honoring Law Enforcement"; and

(3) a depiction of a badge covered by a black mourning band.

(b) After deduction of the department's administrative costs, the remainder of the fee for issuance of the license plates shall be deposited to the credit of an account created by the comptroller in the manner provided by Section 504.6012(b). Money deposited to that account may be used only by the Employees Retirement System of Texas to provide financial assistance to surviving family members of peace officers killed in the line of duty under Chapter 615, Government Code.

(c) Section 504.702 does not apply to a specialty license plate issued under this section.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 478 (H.B. 628), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2023.

SUBCHAPTER H. ADMINISTRATIVE PROVISIONS RELATING TO SPECIALTY LICENSE PLATES FOR GENERAL DISTRIBUTION

Sec. 504.702. SPECIALTY LICENSE PLATES AUTHORIZED AFTER JANUARY 1, 1999. (a) This section applies only to specialty license plates that are authorized to be issued by a law that takes effect on or after January 1, 1999.

(b) The department may manufacture the specialty license plates only if a request for manufacture of the license plates is filed with the department. The request must be:

(1) made in a manner prescribed by the department;

(2) filed before the fifth anniversary of the effective date of the law that authorizes the issuance of the specialty license plates; and

(3) accompanied by a deposit of $8,000.

(c) Repealed by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1296, Sec. 247(21), eff. January 1, 2012.

(d) If a request is not filed with the department before the date specified by Subsection (b)(2), the law that authorizes the issuance of the specialty license plates expires on that date.

(e) The department may issue license plates under:

(1) Section 504.614 for a particular professional sports team only if $8,000 has been deposited with the department for that sports team; or

(2) Section 504.615 for a particular institution of higher education or private college or university only if $8,000 has been deposited with the department for that institution, college, or university.

(f) Money deposited with the department under Subsection (b)(3) or (e) shall be returned by the department to the person who made the deposit after 800 sets of plates have been issued.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1320, Sec. 6, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 729 (H.B. 2627), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1296 (H.B. 2357), Sec. 211, eff. January 1, 2012.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1296 (H.B. 2357), Sec. 247(21), eff. January 1, 2012.

SUBCHAPTER I. DEVELOPMENT OF NEW SPECIALTY LICENSE PLATES

Sec. 504.801. CREATION OF NEW SPECIALTY LICENSE PLATES BY THE DEPARTMENT. (a) The department may create new specialty license plates on its own initiative or on receipt of an application from a potential sponsor. A new specialty license plate created under this section must comply with each requirement of Section 504.702 unless the license is created by the department on its own initiative. The department may permit a specialty license plate created under this section to be personalized. The redesign of an existing specialty license plate at the request of a sponsor shall be treated like the issuance of a new specialty license plate.

(b) Any nonprofit entity may submit an application to the department to sponsor a new specialty license plate. An application may nominate a state agency to receive funds derived from the issuance of the license plates. The application may also identify uses to which those funds should be appropriated.

(c) The department shall design each new specialty license plate in consultation with the sponsor, if any, that applied for creation of that specialty license plate. The department may refuse to create a new specialty license plate if the design might be offensive to any member of the public, if the nominated state agency does not consent to receipt of the funds derived from issuance of the license plate, if the uses identified for those funds might violate a statute or constitutional provision, or for any other reason established by rule. At the request of the sponsor, distribution of the license plate may be limited by the department.

(d) The fee for issuance of license plates created under this subchapter before November 19, 2009, is $30 unless the department sets a higher fee. This subsection does not apply to a specialty license plate marketed and sold by a private vendor at the request of the specialty license plate sponsor.

(d-1) The fee for issuance of license plates created under this subchapter on or after November 19, 2009, is the amount established under Section 504.851.

(e) For each fee collected for a license plate issued by the department under this section:

(1) $8 shall be used to reimburse the department for its administrative costs; and

(2) the remainder shall be deposited to the credit of:

(A) the specialty license plate fund, which is an account in the general revenue fund, if the sponsor nominated a state agency to receive the funds; or

(B) the Texas Department of Motor Vehicles fund if the sponsor did not nominate a state agency to receive the funds or if there is no sponsor.

(f) Subchapter D, Chapter 316, Government Code, and Section 403.095, Government Code, do not apply to fees collected under this subchapter.

(g) The department may report to the legislature at any time concerning implementation of this section. The report may include recommendations concerning the appropriations, by amount, state agency, and uses, that are necessary to implement the requests of sponsors.

(h) The department may vary the design of a license plate created under this section to accommodate or reflect its use on a motor vehicle other than a passenger car or light truck.

(i) The sponsor of a new specialty plate may not be a for-profit enterprise.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1320, Sec. 6, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1136 (H.B. 2553), Sec. 38, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1381 (S.B. 1616), Sec. 7, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1296 (H.B. 2357), Sec. 212, eff. January 1, 2012.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1287 (H.B. 2202), Sec. 39, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 504.802. MARKETING AND SALE BY PRIVATE VENDOR OF SPECIALTY LICENSE PLATES. (a) A sponsor of a specialty license plate created under this subchapter may contract with the private vendor authorized under Subchapter J for the marketing and sale of the specialty license plate.

(b) The fee for issuance of a specialty license plate described by Subsection (a) is the amount established under Section 504.851(c).

(c) Notwithstanding any other law, from each fee received from the issuance of a specialty license plate marketed and sold by the private vendor under this section, the department shall:

(1) deduct the administrative costs described by Section 504.801(e)(1);

(2) deposit the portion of the fee for the sale of the plate that the state would ordinarily receive under the contract described by Section 504.851(a) to the credit of:

(A) the specialty license plate fund, if the sponsor nominated a state agency to receive the funds;

(B) the general revenue fund, if the sponsor did not nominate a state agency to receive the funds or if there is no sponsor; or

(C) for a license plate issued under Section 504.614, the public entity that provides or provided funds for the professional sports team's facility; and

(3) pay to the private vendor the remainder of the fee.

(d) A sponsor of a specialty license plate may reestablish its specialty license plate under Sections 504.601 and 504.702 and be credited its previous deposit with the department if a contract entered into by the sponsor under Subsection (a) terminates.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1381 (S.B. 1616), Sec. 8, eff. September 1, 2009.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1296 (H.B. 2357), Sec. 213, eff. January 1, 2012.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1296 (H.B. 2357), Sec. 214, eff. January 1, 2012.

SUBCHAPTER J. MARKETING OF SPECIALTY PLATES THROUGH PRIVATE VENDOR

Sec. 504.851. CONTRACT WITH PRIVATE VENDOR. (a) The department may enter into a contract with the private vendor whose proposal is most advantageous to the state, as determined from competitive sealed proposals that satisfy the requirements of this section, for the marketing and sale of:

(1) personalized license plates; or

(2) with the agreement of the private vendor, other specialty license plates authorized by Subchapters G and I.

(a-1) The department may not issue specialty, personalized, or souvenir license plates with background colors other than white, unless the plates are marketed and sold by the private vendor.

(a-2) Specialty license plates authorized for marketing and sale under Subsection (a) may be personalized and must include:

(1) specialty license plates created under Subchapters G and I on or after November 19, 2009; and

(2) at the request of the specialty license plate sponsor, an existing specialty license plate created under Subchapters G and I before November 19, 2009.

(a-3) The department may contract with the private vendor for the vendor to:

(1) host all or some of the specialty license plates on the vendor's website;

(2) process the purchase of specialty license plates hosted on the vendor's website and pay any additional transaction cost; and

(3) share in the personalization fee for the license plates hosted on the vendor's website.

(b) The board by rule shall establish fees for the issuance or renewal of personalized license plates that are marketed and sold by the private vendor. Fees must be reasonable and not less than the greater of:

(1) the amounts necessary to allow the department to recover all reasonable costs to the department associated with the evaluation of the competitive sealed proposals received by the department and with the implementation and enforcement of the contract, including direct, indirect, and administrative costs; or

(2) the amount established by Section 504.853(b).

(c) The board by rule shall establish the fees for the issuance or renewal of souvenir license plates, specialty license plates, or souvenir or specialty license plates that are personalized that are marketed and sold by the private vendor or hosted on the private vendor's website. The state's portion of the personalization fee may not be less than $40 for each year issued. Other fees must be reasonable and not less than the amounts necessary to allow the department to recover all reasonable costs to the department associated with the evaluation of the competitive sealed proposals received by the department and with the implementation and enforcement of the contract, including direct, indirect, and administrative costs. A fee established under this subsection is in addition to:

(1) the registration fee and any optional registration fee prescribed by this chapter for the vehicle for which specialty license plates are issued;

(2) any additional fee prescribed by this subchapter for the issuance of specialty license plates for that vehicle; and

(3) any additional fee prescribed by this subchapter for the issuance of personalized license plates for that vehicle.

(c-1) Subsections (b) and (c) do not apply to the sale at auction of a specialty plate or personalized specialty plate that is not used on a motor vehicle.

(d) At any time as necessary to comply with Subsection (b) or (c), the board may increase or decrease the amount of a fee established under the applicable subsection.

(e) The portion of a contract with a private vendor regarding the marketing and sale of personalized license plates is payable only from amounts derived from the collection of the fee established under Subsection (b). The portion of a contract with a private vendor regarding the marketing, hosting, and sale of souvenir license plates, specialty license plates, or souvenir or specialty license plates that are personalized under Section 504.102 is payable only from amounts derived from the collection of the fee established under Subsection (c).

(f) The department may approve new design and color combinations for personalized or specialty license plates that are marketed and sold by a private vendor under a contract entered into with the private vendor. Each approved license plate design and color combination remains the property of the department.

(g) The department may approve new design and color combinations for specialty license plates authorized by this chapter, including specialty license plates that may be personalized, that are marketed and sold by a private vendor under a contract entered into with the private vendor. Each approved license plate design and color combination remains the property of the department. Except as otherwise provided by this chapter, this subsection does not authorize:

(1) the department to approve a design or color combination for a specialty license plate that is inconsistent with the design or color combination specified for the license plate by the section of this chapter that authorizes the issuance of the specialty license plate; or

(2) the private vendor to market and sell a specialty license plate with a design or color combination that is inconsistent with the design or color combination specified by that section.

(g-1) The department may not:

(1) publish a proposed design or color combination for a specialty license plate for public comment in the Texas Register or otherwise, except on the department's website for a period not to exceed 10 days; or

(2) restrict the background color, color combinations, or color alphanumeric license plate numbers of a specialty license plate, except as determined by the Department of Public Safety as necessary for law enforcement purposes.

(h) Subject to the limitations provided by Subsections (g) and (g-1), the department may disapprove a design, cancel a license plate, or require the discontinuation of a license plate design or color combination that is marketed, hosted, or sold by a private vendor under contract at any time if the department determines that the disapproval, cancellation, or discontinuation is in the best interest of this state or the motoring public.

(i) A contract entered into by the department with a private vendor under this section:

(1) must comply with any law generally applicable to a contract for services entered into by the department;

(2) must require the private vendor to render at least quarterly to the department periodic accounts that accurately detail all material transactions, including information reasonably required by the department to support fees that are collected by the vendor, and to regularly remit all money payable to the department under the contract;

(3) may allow or require the private vendor to establish an electronic infrastructure coordinated and compatible with the department's registration system, by which motor vehicle owners may electronically send and receive applications, other documents, or required payments, and that, when secure access is necessary, can be electronically validated by the department; and

(4) must allow for the establishment of a range of premium embossed specialty license plates to be sourced, marketed, and sold by the vendor.

(j) From amounts received by the department under the contract described by Subsection (a), the department shall deposit to the credit of the Texas Department of Motor Vehicles fund an amount sufficient to enable the department to recover its administrative costs for all license plates issued under this section, any payments to the vendor under the contract, and any other amounts allocated by law to the Texas Department of Motor Vehicles fund. To the extent that the disposition of other amounts received by the department is governed by another law, those amounts shall be deposited in accordance with the other law. Any additional amount received by the department under the contract shall be deposited to the credit of the general revenue fund.

(k) Repealed by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1296, Sec. 247(22), eff. January 1, 2012.

(l) A contract entered into with the private vendor shall provide for the department to recover all costs incurred by the department in implementing this section. Under the contract, the department may require the private vendor to reimburse the department in advance for:

(1) not more than one-half of the department's anticipated costs in connection with the contract; and

(2) the department's anticipated costs in connection with the introduction of a new specialty license plate.

(m) If the private vendor ceases operation:

(1) the program may be operated temporarily by the department under new agreements with the license plate sponsors until another vendor is selected and begins operation; and

(2) the private vendor's share of the revenue is deposited to the credit of the general revenue fund.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1320, Sec. 6, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 754 (H.B. 2894), Sec. 1, eff. June 17, 2005.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 933 (H.B. 3097), Sec. 2G.03, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1381 (S.B. 1616), Sec. 9, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1381 (S.B. 1616), Sec. 11(2), eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1296 (H.B. 2357), Sec. 215, eff. September 1, 2014.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1296 (H.B. 2357), Sec. 216, eff. January 1, 2012.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1296 (H.B. 2357), Sec. 247(22), eff. January 1, 2012.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1287 (H.B. 2202), Sec. 40, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 148 (S.B. 702), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 504.852. CONTRACT LIMITATIONS. (a) In a contract under Section 504.851, the department may not:

(1) unreasonably disapprove or limit any aspect of a private vendor's marketing and sales plan;

(2) unreasonably interfere with the selection, assignment, or management by the private vendor of the private vendor's employees, agents, or subcontractors; or

(3) require a private vendor to market and sell souvenir license plates, specialty license plates, or souvenir or specialty license plates personalized under Section 504.102.

(b) If a private vendor contracts to market and sell souvenir license plates, specialty license plates, or souvenir or specialty license plates personalized under Section 504.102, the initial term of the contract shall be for at least five years from the effective date of the contract. The contract may provide, with the agreement of the department and the private vendor, a second term at least equal in length to the initial term of the contract.

(c) Notwithstanding Subsection (b), a private vendor may not market and sell souvenir license plates, specialty license plates, or souvenir or specialty license plates personalized under Section 504.102 that compete directly for sales with another specialty license plate issued under this chapter unless the department and the sponsoring agency or organization of the other license plate approve.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 754 (H.B. 2894), Sec. 2, eff. June 17, 2005.

Sec. 504.853. SPECIALTY AND PERSONALIZED LICENSE PLATES ISSUED BEFORE NOVEMBER 19, 2009. (a) A specialty or personalized license plate issued before November 19, 2009, may be issued for a subsequent registration period only if the applicant submits an application and pays the required fee for the applicable registration period. A person who is issued a personalized license plate has first priority on that license plate for each subsequent registration period for which the person submits a new application for that plate.

(b) Unless the board by rule adopts a higher fee or the license plate is not renewed annually, the fee for issuance of a license plate issued before November 19, 2009, is:

(1) the fee provided for in Section 504.601 for a specialty license plate; and

(2) $40 for a personalized license plate.

(c) A person who is issued a specialty or personalized license plate by the department before November 19, 2009, may:

(1) submit an application for the plate under Subsection (a) and pay the required fee for each subsequent registration period under Subsection (b); or

(2) purchase through the private vendor a license to display the alphanumeric pattern on a license plate for any term allowed by law.

(d) The department may not issue a replacement set of personalized license plates to the same person before the period set by rule unless the applicant for issuance of replacement plates pays an additional fee of $30.

(e) Of each fee collected by the department under Subsection (b)(2):

(1) $1.25 shall be used by the department to defray the cost of administering this section; and

(2) the remainder shall be deposited to the credit of the general revenue fund.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1381 (S.B. 1616), Sec. 10, eff. September 1, 2009.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1296 (H.B. 2357), Sec. 217, eff. January 1, 2012.

Sec. 504.854. AUCTION. (a) The board by rule may provide for the private vendor to:

(1) sell at auction a license to display a unique alphanumeric pattern on a license plate for a period set by board rule;

(2) reserve an unissued alphanumeric pattern from the department for purposes of auctioning a license to display the pattern for a period set by board rule; and

(3) purchase from a customer an unexpired license to display an alphanumeric pattern for purposes of auction by the vendor.

(b) A license to display an alphanumeric pattern purchased under this section may be transferred to another person without payment of the fee provided by Section 504.855.

(c) Repealed by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1296, Sec. 247(23), eff. January 1, 2012.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1381 (S.B. 1616), Sec. 10, eff. September 1, 2009.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1296 (H.B. 2357), Sec. 218, eff. January 1, 2012.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1296 (H.B. 2357), Sec. 247(23), eff. January 1, 2012.

Sec. 504.855. TRANSFERABILITY OF CERTAIN PATTERNS. The board by rule may:

(1) authorize a person who purchases a license to display an alphanumeric pattern for a period of five years or more to transfer the license; and

(2) establish a transfer fee to be distributed in accordance with the contract with the private vendor.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1296 (H.B. 2357), Sec. 219, eff. January 1, 2012.

SUBCHAPTER K. TRANSFER AND REMOVAL OF LICENSE PLATES

Text of section effective until July 01, 2025

Sec. 504.901. TRANSFER AND REMOVAL OF LICENSE PLATES. (a) On the sale or transfer of a motor vehicle to a dealer who holds a general distinguishing number issued under Chapter 503, the dealer shall remove each license plate issued for the motor vehicle. A person may use the license plates removed from a motor vehicle on a new motor vehicle purchased from a dealer after the person obtains the department's approval of a title and registration application.

(b) On the sale or transfer of a motor vehicle to a person who does not hold a general distinguishing number issued under Chapter 503, the seller may remove each license plate issued for the motor vehicle. The license plates may be transferred to another vehicle titled in the seller's name if the seller obtains:

(1) the department's approval of an application to transfer the license plates; and

(2) a new registration insignia for the motor vehicle.

(c) A license plate removed from a motor vehicle that is not transferred to another motor vehicle must be disposed of in a manner specified by the department.

(d) To be eligible for transfer, license plates must be appropriate for the class of vehicle to which the plates are being transferred.

(e) This section applies only to:

(1) a passenger vehicle with a gross weight of 6,000 pounds or less; and

(2) a light truck with a gross weight of 10,000 pounds or less.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1296 (H.B. 2357), Sec. 220, eff. January 1, 2012.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1135 (H.B. 2741), Sec. 82, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 668 (H.B. 718), Sec. 27, eff. July 1, 2025.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 668 (H.B. 718), Sec. 32(10), eff. July 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on July 01, 2025

Sec. 504.901. TRANSFER OF LICENSE PLATES. (a) On the sale or transfer of a motor vehicle to a dealer who holds a general distinguishing number issued under Chapter 503, the dealer shall remove each license plate issued for the motor vehicle. Each license plate issued for the motor vehicle shall be assigned to a subsequent purchaser of the motor vehicle at retail sale as required by Section 503.063.

(b) On the sale or transfer of a motor vehicle to a person who does not hold a general distinguishing number issued under Chapter 503, each license plate issued for the motor vehicle shall remain with the motor vehicle.

(b-1) The purchaser of a motor vehicle may request replacement license plates under Section 504.007.

(c) Repealed by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 668 (H.B. 718), Sec. 32(10), eff. July 1, 2025.

(d) Repealed by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 668 (H.B. 718), Sec. 32(10), eff. July 1, 2025.

(e) Repealed by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 668 (H.B. 718), Sec. 32(10), eff. July 1, 2025.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1296 (H.B. 2357), Sec. 220, eff. January 1, 2012.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 668 (H.B. 718), Sec. 27, eff. July 1, 2025.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 668 (H.B. 718), Sec. 28, eff. July 1, 2025.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 668 (H.B. 718), Sec. 32(10), eff. July 1, 2025.

SUBCHAPTER L. OFFENSES AND PENALTIES

Sec. 504.941. ANTIQUE VEHICLES; OFFENSE. (a) A person who violates Section 504.502 commits an offense. An offense under this section is a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not less than $5 or more than $200.

(b) It is an affirmative defense to prosecution under this section that at the time of the offense the vehicle was en route to or from a location for the purpose of routine maintenance of the vehicle.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1296 (H.B. 2357), Sec. 221, eff. January 1, 2012.

Sec. 504.942. LOG LOADER VEHICLES; PENALTIES. A vehicle operated in violation of Section 504.506 is considered to be operated or moved while unregistered and is immediately subject to the applicable fees and penalties prescribed by this chapter.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1296 (H.B. 2357), Sec. 221, eff. January 1, 2012.

Sec. 504.943. OPERATION OF VEHICLE WITHOUT LICENSE PLATE. (a) Except as provided by Subsection (b), a person commits an offense if the person operates on a public highway, during a registration period, a motor vehicle that does not display two license plates that:

(1) have been assigned by the department for the period; and

(2) comply with department rules regarding the placement of license plates.

(b) A person commits an offense if the person operates on a public highway during a registration period a road tractor, motorcycle, trailer, or semitrailer that does not display a license plate that:

(1) has been assigned by the department for the period; and

(2) complies with department rules regarding the placement of license plates.

(c) This section does not apply to a dealer operating a vehicle as provided by law.

(d) A court may dismiss a charge brought under Subsection (a)(1) if the defendant:

(1) remedies the defect before the defendant's first court appearance; and

(2) pays a reimbursement fee not to exceed $10.

(e) An offense under this section is a misdemeanor punishable by a fine not to exceed $200.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1296 (H.B. 2357), Sec. 221, eff. January 1, 2012.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 260 (H.B. 625), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1352 (S.B. 346), Sec. 2.65, eff. January 1, 2020.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 919 (S.B. 1923), Sec. 13, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 504.944. OPERATION OF VEHICLE WITH WRONG LICENSE PLATE. A person commits an offense if the person operates, or as the owner permits another to operate, on a public highway a motor vehicle that has attached to it a number plate or registration insignia issued for a different vehicle. An offense under this section is a misdemeanor punishable by a fine not to exceed $200.

Transferred, redesignated and amended from Transportation Code, Section 502.408 by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1296 (H.B. 2357), Sec. 222, eff. January 1, 2012.

Sec. 504.945. WRONG, FICTITIOUS, ALTERED, OR OBSCURED LICENSE PLATE. (a) A person commits an offense if the person attaches to or displays on a motor vehicle a license plate that:

(1) is issued for a different motor vehicle;

(2) is issued for the vehicle under any other motor vehicle law other than by the department;

(3) is assigned for a registration period other than the registration period in effect;

(4) is fictitious;

(5) has blurring or reflective matter that significantly impairs the readability of the name of the state in which the vehicle is registered or the letters or numbers of the license plate number at any time;

(6) has an attached illuminated device or sticker, decal, emblem, or other insignia that is not authorized by law and that interferes with the readability of the letters or numbers of the license plate number or the name of the state in which the vehicle is registered; or

(7) has a coating, covering, protective substance, or other material that:

(A) distorts angular visibility or detectability;

(B) alters or obscures one-half or more of the name of the state in which the vehicle is registered; or

(C) alters, covers, or obscures the letters or numbers of the license plate number or the color of the plate.

(b) Except as provided by Subsections (e) and (f), an offense under Subsection (a) is a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not more than $200, unless it is shown at the trial of the offense that the owner knowingly altered or made illegible the letters, numbers, and other identification marks, in which case the offense is a Class B misdemeanor.

(c) Subsection (a)(7) may not be construed to apply to:

(1) a trailer hitch installed on a vehicle in a normal or customary manner;

(2) a transponder, as defined by Section 228.057, that is attached to a vehicle in the manner required by the issuing authority;

(3) a wheelchair lift or wheelchair carrier that is attached to a vehicle in a normal or customary manner;

(4) a trailer being towed by a vehicle; or

(5) a bicycle or motorcycle rack that is attached to a vehicle in a normal or customary manner.

(d) A court may dismiss a charge brought under Subsection (a)(3), (5), (6), or (7) if the defendant:

(1) remedies the defect before the defendant's first court appearance;

(2) pays a reimbursement fee not to exceed $10; and

(3) shows that the vehicle was issued a plate by the department that was attached to the vehicle, establishing that the vehicle was registered for the period during which the offense was committed.

(e) An offense under Subsection (a)(4) is a Class B misdemeanor.

(f) An offense under Subsection (a)(7)(C) is a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not more than $300, except that the offense is:

(1) a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not more than $600 if it is shown on the trial of the offense that the person has been previously convicted of an offense under Subsection (a)(7)(C); or

(2) a Class B misdemeanor if it is shown on the trial of the offense that the person has been previously convicted two or more times of an offense under Subsection (a)(7)(C).

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1296 (H.B. 2357), Sec. 223, eff. January 1, 2012.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1135 (H.B. 2741), Sec. 83, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1352 (S.B. 346), Sec. 2.66, eff. January 1, 2020.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 919 (S.B. 1923), Sec. 14, eff. September 1, 2021.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 445 (H.B. 2195), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 504.946. DECEPTIVELY SIMILAR LICENSE PLATE. (a) A person commits an offense if the person:

(1) manufactures, sells, or possesses a license plate deceptively similar to a license plate issued by the department; or

(2) makes a copy or likeness of a license plate deceptively similar to a license plate issued by the department with intent to sell the copy or likeness.

(b) For the purposes of this section, a license plate is deceptively similar to a license plate issued by the department if it is not prescribed by the department but a reasonable person would presume that it was prescribed by the department.

(c) A district or county court, on application of the attorney general or of the district attorney or prosecuting attorney performing the duties of the district attorney for the district in which the court is located, may enjoin a violation or threatened violation of this section on a showing that a violation has occurred or is likely to occur.

(d) It is an affirmative defense to a prosecution under this section that the license plate was produced pursuant to a licensing agreement with the department.

(e) An offense under this section is:

(1) a felony of the third degree if the person manufactures or sells a deceptively similar license plate; or

(2) a Class C misdemeanor if the person possesses a deceptively similar license plate, except that the offense is a Class B misdemeanor if the person has previously been convicted of an offense under this subdivision.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1135 (H.B. 2741), Sec. 84, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 504.9465. LICENSE PLATE FLIPPER; OFFENSE. (a) In this section, "license plate flipper" means a manual, electronic, or mechanical device designed or adapted to be installed on a motor vehicle and:

(1) switch between two or more license plates for the purpose of allowing a motor vehicle operator to change the license plate displayed on the operator's vehicle; or

(2) hide a license plate from view by flipping the license plate so that the license plate number is not visible.

(b) A person commits an offense if the person with criminal negligence purchases or possesses a license plate flipper. An offense under this subsection is a Class B misdemeanor.

(c) A person commits an offense if the person with criminal negligence manufactures, sells, offers to sell, or otherwise distributes a license plate flipper. An offense under this subsection is a Class A misdemeanor.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 809 (S.B. 1757), Sec. 1, eff. June 14, 2013.

Redesignated from Transportation Code, Section 504.946 by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1236 (S.B. 1296), Sec. 21.001(57), eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 504.948. GENERAL PENALTY. (a) A person commits an offense if the person violates a provision of this chapter and no other penalty is prescribed for the violation.

(b) An offense under Subsection (a) is a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not less than $5 or more than $200.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1135 (H.B. 2741), Sec. 84, eff. June 14, 2013.